    Michael Willingham | Willingham Services | ZoomInfo.com




















 



 WMI Liquidating Trust Provides Information On Escrow CUSIPs 
         










    










 






 











 









WMI Liquidating Trust Provides Information On Escrow CUSIPs

Mar 24, 2015, 16:05 ET
		  		  					
						 from   WMI Liquidating Trust 











 
















































 

 




















 


SEATTLE, March 24, 2015 /PRNewswire/ -- WMI Liquidating Trust, formed pursuant to the confirmed Seventh Amended Joint Plan of Affiliated Debtors under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (as modified, the "Plan") of Washington Mutual, Inc. ("WMI"), today provided additional information regarding certain Escrow CUSIPs issued to eligible former shareholders of WMI.  Eligible former shareholders are those who timely submitted relevant documentation, including the release required under Section 41.6 of the Plan.  
As of the Effective Date of the Plan, Depository Trust Company ("DTC") established and maintains positions in the Escrow CUSIPs.  These Escrow CUSIPs represent nominees' positions that would be used to make future distributions, if any, of common stock issued by WMI Holdings Corp. ("WMIHC").  Pursuant to the Plan, such shares of WMIHC's common stock were deposited in the Disputed Equity Escrow established in accordance with the Plan and are to be maintained in the Disputed Equity Escrow until such time as Claims involving Disputed Equity Interests are either allowed or disallowed.  
Upon resolution of those Claims, the related portion of the shares maintained in the Disputed Equity Escrow will be distributed to the claimant holding the newly allowed claim or, if the claim is disallowed, the related portion of the shares will be redistributed to beneficiaries of the Trust in accordance with the distribution mechanics set forth in the Plan.  In the event any future distributions of WMIHC common stock are made from the Disputed Equity Reserve, DTC will be instructed to allocate such common stock to each of the Escrow CUSIPs on a pro rata basis. 
As stated above, the Escrow CUSIPs were established for any potential distributions of shares of WMIHC common stock.  The only source of common stock available for any such a distribution would be from the 2.9 million of shares remaining on deposit in the Disputed Equity Escrow.  Specifically, the Escrow CUSIPs do not, in and of themselves, entitle their holders to any possible future cash distributions from the Trust, WMIHC or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (either in its corporate capacity or as the receiver for Washington Mutual Bank).  
The Trust will issue Liquidating Trust Interests to WMI's former shareholders if the Trust is able to monetize Liquidating Trust Assets in amounts sufficient to pay-in-full claims held by beneficiaries of the Trust who are senior to members of Classes 19 and 22, and if a shareholder satisfied all conditions applicable to receiving any such Liquidating Trust Interests.  There can be no assurances that the Trust will be able to monetize assets in a manner sufficient to give effect to the foregoing.  
The Trust discloses the status of its operations (including the status of pending litigations) and unaudited financial information in a Form 10-K filed annually with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In addition, the Trust files a Quarterly Summary Report with the Bankruptcy Court and under Form 8-K with the Securities Exchange Commission.  
Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined in this Press Release have the meanings given to such terms of the Plan.  The Plan and additional information about WMI Liquidating Trust can be found at www.wmitrust.com.   
Cautionary Statement Regarding Forward-Looking Statements
This press release may contain certain estimates, statements of belief and assumptions that may be deemed to be "forward-looking statements" within the meaning of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and/or covered by the "Bespeaks Caution" doctrine applied by the courts under the antifraud provisions of the federal securities laws. Such forward-looking statements are based on current plans, expectations, estimates and beliefs about the value of the assets of the Trust.  Words such as "anticipates," "expects," "intends," "plans," "believes," "seeks," "estimates" or variations of such words and similar expressions are intended to identify such forward-looking statements.  These statements are not guarantees of future payments to holders of beneficial interests in the Trust ("Liquidating Trust Interests") and are subject to risks and uncertainties that are difficult to predict.  These risks include, among other factors: (i) the Trust's ability to obtain Court approval with respect to motions in the chapter 11 proceedings of WMI and WMI's wholly-owned subsidiary, WMI Investment Corp. (together with WMI, the "Debtors"); (ii) the Trust's ability to resolve disputed claims; (iii) risks associated with any litigation and other claims that might be brought against the Debtors or by or against the Trust in the future during the term of the Trust (the initial period of which was three years and was extended for up to three years); and (iv) there is no liquidity for the Liquidating Trust Interests, which are non-certificated and non-transferable other than by will, intestate succession or operation of law.
Contact 
Andrew Siegel / Aaron PalashJoele Frank, Wilkinson Brimmer Katcher(212) 355-4449
 SOURCE  WMI Liquidating Trust  

RELATED LINKS
http://www.wmitrust.com



  

 View Table Fullscreen 




  View Table Fullscreen 





Journalists and Bloggers
The news you need, when you need it.
 
Join PR Newswire for Journalists to access all of the free services designated to make your job easier.
In need of subject matter experts for your story? Submit a free ProfNet request and find the sources you need.
LEARN MORE




 

 
 



















































  











Jan 30, 2017, 16:01 ET
Preview: WMI Liquidating Trust Announces Cash Distribution Of Approximately $19 Million













Oct 14, 2014, 19:20 ET
Preview: WMI Liquidating Trust Files Lawsuit Against Former Directors And Officers Of Washington Mutual






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 Read More





Jan 30, 2017, 16:01 ET
WMI Liquidating Trust Issues Statement On Escrow CUSIPS








Jan 30, 2017, 16:01 ET
WMI Liquidating Trust Announces Cash Distribution Of...






 More news releases in:

  Banking & Financial Services










Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

 















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 


 



WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST Seattle WA, 98101 - Cortera Company Profile
















cortera. business directory



Create
								Account
Login
Developers





Search Cortera for a Business









State
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Puerto Rico
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming














Home
Business
							Directory
Depository Institutions
WMI Liquidating Trust
Cortera Support: 866-589-0664







WMI Liquidating Trust



1201 3rd Ave, Ste 3000

Seattle,
							
							
							 WA
							
							
							 98101-3013
							
							 |  view map


(206) 432-8887

www.wmitrust.com


						Looking for more information? Sign
							up for FREE!







Company Overview

WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST is in the Savings Institutions, Not Federally Chartered industry in Seattle, WA.  This company currently has approximately 5 to 10 employees  and  annual sales of $5,000,000 to $9,999,999.













Company Details

Location Type:
						Single Location
					

Industry:
						Savings Institutions, Not Federally Chartered
					

Ownership: Private
						
					

Year Founded:
						2012
					

Sales Range:
						$5,000,000 to $9,999,999
					

Employees:
						5 to 10


     
    
   
  

						Have fresher information?  Update
















Latest Company News







READ ALL COMPANY NEWS IN THE
									COMPLETE COMPANY CREDIT REPORT







Recent Company Alerts

Credit Risk Increase
No


Overall Payments
No


Peer Payments
No


Public Records
No


Financial News
No












								Alerts on more than 5,000 companies today,
								including:
							

Walbro


Ideal Construction CO


A 1 Raidator Service


Barnes & Noble


Southern Cleaning Service Inc


RAM Enterprises Inc


Hammer & CO


University of Alaska Fairbanks


TRI State Metal Works


Mitchell Industrial Contractors Inc








Community Payment Ratings
















								LATEST COMMUNITY REVIEWS OF THIS COMPANY
								
							

Cortera is much more than an awesome business
									directory! It's an active community where real business people
									share the real deal on real businesses.

It's invaluable intel
										that's now available for FREE.



Get the inside scoop with ratings and reviews on WMI Liquidating Trust
Rate WMI Liquidating Trust on their
										payment behavior
									
Ask your network about WMI Liquidating Trust
										with Cortera Circles
									


Join
										the Cortera Community for free today.
								








The information contained in this company profile is compiled from third party sources, including but not limited to public records, user submissions, and other commercially available data sources. These sources may not be accurate, complete, or up-to-date. 
Cortera makes no representations or warranties regarding, and assumes no responsibility for, the accuracy, completeness, or currency of the information contained herein. 
Cortera products are enabled by SOFIE™, our proprietary technology platform for rapid data processing, robust analytics and flexible data access.











© 2017 Cortera, Inc. All rights reserved.

Sitemap





Cortera Support: 866-589-0664 |
How Does it Work? |
Who
					Do We Help? |
Company Profiles |
Community
				|
Media
				|
About






Today's
					Hot Company Profiles

VOLATUS MAXIMUS LLC
W & B TRUCKING INC
VOGUE
VOLUNTEERS OF AMERICA INC
VUDEN INC
VOLTAIRE
VOORHEES ARIZONA TASTE INC
VORA SHAILESH C MD
VOLUME REVERSAL SURVEY
VOGT JAMES B MD

More
							Today's Hot Companies »



Recently
					Updated Companies

YADIN CO INC
TRAX TECHNOLOGIES INC
TOWN OF SNEAD TOWN HALL
KNUD NIELSEN CO INC
ARKANSAS APPLIANCE & AIR CONDITIONING INC
CKC CONSTRUCTION & MATERIALS LLC
FACTOR SALES INC
ORGANIZED SPACES LLC
INDUSTRIAL ELECTRICAL SUPPLY INC
SANDERS PLUMBING & ELECTRIC

More
								Recently Updated Companies »



Recently
					Rated Company Profiles

STINGER WELDING INC
MD THOMAS CONSTRUCTION LLC
PANALPINA INC
AZURADISC
SLT EXPRESS WAY INC
SUNSTAR HEATING & AIRE
IDEAL TRUE VALUE INC
JR BALL CONTRACTING GROUP INC
LAW OFFICES OF SUSAN M SCHAUF
GLOBAL MERCHANDISING INC

More
								Recently Rated Companies »



Industry Directory




Terms & Conditions
Privacy Policy





 
  
 

 

  



































 



 WMI Liquidating Trust Issues Statement On Escrow CUSIPS 
         










    










 













 











 



















WMI Liquidating Trust Issues Statement On Escrow CUSIPS
        																										
              











 News provided by
WMI Liquidating Trust  
Mar 16, 2017, 17:30 ET









 Share this article




























































SEATTLE, March 16, 2017 /PRNewswire/ -- WMI Liquidating Trust (the "Trust"), formed pursuant to the confirmed Seventh Amended Joint Plan of Affiliated Debtors under Chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code (as modified, the "Plan") of Washington Mutual, Inc. ("WMI"), today issued a statement regarding certain Escrow CUSIPs issued to eligible former shareholders of WMI.  Eligible former shareholders are those who timely submitted relevant documentation, including the release required under Section 41.6 of the Plan.  








The Trust has received inquiries regarding the status of "Escrow CUSIPs" issued on the Effective Date in accordance with the Plan.  As has been stated in the past, such Escrow CUSIPs were issued solely to facilitate potential future distributions, if any, to eligible former shareholders of WMI if Claims involving Disputed Equity Interests are disallowed.  
By way of background, as of the Effective Date of the Plan, the Depository Trust Company ("DTC") established and maintains positions in the aforementioned Escrow CUSIPs.  These Escrow CUSIPs represent nominees' positions that would be used to make future distributions, if any, of common stock issued by WMIH Corp. (formerly known as WMI Holdings Corp. ("WMIHC")).  Pursuant to the Plan, such shares of WMIHC's common stock were deposited in the Disputed Equity Escrow established in accordance with the Plan and are to be maintained in the Disputed Equity Escrow until such time as Claims involving Disputed Equity Interests are either allowed or disallowed.  
Upon resolution of those Claims, the related portion of the shares maintained in the Disputed Equity Escrow will be distributed to claimants holding the newly allowed claim or, if the claim is disallowed, the related portion of the shares will be redistributed to beneficiaries of the Trust in accordance with the distribution mechanics set forth in the Plan.  In the event any future distributions of WMIHC common stock are made from the Disputed Equity Reserve, DTC will be instructed to allocate such common stock to each of the Escrow CUSIPs on a pro rata basis. 
In June 2015, several Claims were disallowed and 1.4 million shares were subsequently distributed to holders of Escrow CUSIPs on a pro rata basis; however, a holder received such a distribution solely to the extent such holder's ownership position resulted in a distribution of at least one share.  Since that date, no additional disallowances with respect to those relevant Claims have occurred. On that basis, former positions represented by the Escrow CUSIPs are not currently entitled to receive any distributions under the terms of the Plan. 
As stated above, the Escrow CUSIPS were established solely to facilitate potential distributions, if any, of shares of WMIHC common stock.  The only source of common stock available for any such a distribution would be from the 1.5 million of shares remaining on deposit in the Disputed Equity Escrow.  Specifically, the Escrow CUSIPS do not, in and of themselves, represent an entitlement to any possible future cash distributions from the Trust, WMIHC or the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (either in its corporate capacity or as the receiver for Washington Mutual Bank), as the case may be.  
In accordance with the Plan, the Trust will issue Liquidating Trust Interests to WMI's former shareholders if, and only if, the Trust is able to monetize Liquidating Trust Assets in amounts sufficient to pay-in-full claims held by beneficiaries of the Trust who are senior to members of Classes 19 and 22, and then, only if a shareholder had satisfied timely all conditions applicable to receiving any such Liquidating Trust Interests.  There can be no assurances that the Trust will be able to monetize assets in a manner sufficient to give effect to the foregoing.  
The Trust regularly discloses the status of its operations (including the status of pending litigations) and unaudited financial information in a Form 10-K filed annually with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  In addition, the Trust files a Quarterly Summary Report with the Bankruptcy Court and under Form 8-K with the Securities Exchange Commission.  
Capitalized terms used and not otherwise defined in this Press Release have the meanings given to such terms in the Plan.  The Plan and additional information about WMI Liquidating Trust can be found at www.wmitrust.com.  
Contact 
Andrew Siegel / Aaron PalashJoele Frank, Wilkinson Brimmer Katcher(212) 355-4449
To view the original version on PR Newswire, visit:http://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/wmi-liquidating-trust-issues-statement-on-escrow-cusips-300425225.html
SOURCE WMI Liquidating Trust
 Related Links

http://www.wmitrust.com



 













Jan 30, 2017, 16:01 ET
Preview: WMI Liquidating Trust Announces Cash Distribution Of Approximately $19 Million






My News


  Release contains wide tables.	  View fullscreen.





 Also from this source




 

Jan 30, 2017, 16:01 ET
                                  				                                                                                     
                              WMI Liquidating Trust Announces Cash Distribution Of...






 Explore
 More news releases in similar topics

  Banking & Financial Services
Bankruptcy








 You just read:
WMI Liquidating Trust Issues Statement On Escrow CUSIPS


 News provided by
WMI Liquidating Trust  
Mar 16, 2017, 17:30 ET








 Share this article









































 











Looking to send a news release with PR Newswire?
Take advantage of the world's leading distribution platform.
Sign up to get started
Request more information
Have an account? Log In

















Search











Searching for your content...









Advanced Search












































 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 







WMI Liquidating Trust v. Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation et al































Search




Advanced Search

Take a Free Trial | 
					Sign In






















 Close


Law360 In-Depth
Law360 UK
Adv. Search & Platform Tools
Browse all sections 
Banking
Bankruptcy
Class Action
Competition
Employment
Energy
Expert Analysis
Insurance
Intellectual Property
Product Liability
Securities
Rankings
Law360's MVPs
Glass Ceiling Report
Global 20
Law360 400
Diversity Snapshot
Practice Group Partner Rankings
Practice Groups of the Year
Pro Bono Firms of the Year
Rising Stars
Trial Aces
Site Menu
Join the Law360 team
Search legal jobs
Learn more about Law360
Read testimonials
Contact Law360
Sign up for our newsletters
Site Map
Help










August 25, 2014
WMI Liquidating Trust v. Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation et al



Track this case


Case Number:
1:14-cv-01097
Court:
Delaware
Nature of Suit:
Bankruptcy Withdrawl
Judge:
Gregory M. Sleet
Firms

Baird Mandalas
Ciardi Ciardi
Gellert Scali
O'Kelly & Ernst
Richards Layton
Weir & Partners

Companies

Washington Mutual Inc.

Government Agencies

Federal Deposit Insurance Corp.

Sectors & Industries:


Financial

Pacific Banks










View recent docket activity


Reflects complaints, answers, motions, orders and trial notes entered from Jan. 1, 2011.Additional or older documents may be available in Pacer.




Parties
To view the parties, register now.



Try Law360 FREE for seven days
Already a subscriber? Click here to login

















×
Already have access? Click here to login



Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers
Register Now!




Get instant access to the one-stop news source for business lawyers













Email (Professional email required)






First Name



Last Name







PLEASE NOTE: A verification email will be sent to your address before you can access your trial.


Password (at least 6 characters required)



Confirm Password







Select at least one primary interest:


 Aerospace & Defense
										

 Appellate
										

 Asset Management
										

 Automotive
										

 Banking
										

 Bankruptcy
										

 California
										

 Capital Markets
										

 Class Action
										

 Commercial Contracts
										

 Competition
										

 Consumer Protection
										

 Corporate
										

 Cybersecurity & Privacy
										

 Delaware
										

 Employment
										

 Energy
										

 Environmental
										

 Financial Services Uk
										

 Florida
										

 Food & Beverage
										

 Government Contracts
										

 Health
										

 Hospitality
										

 Illinois
										

 Immigration
										

 Insurance
										

 Insurance Uk
										

 Intellectual Property
										

 International Arbitration
										

 International Trade
										

 Law360 In Depth
										

 Legal Ethics
										

 Life Sciences
										

 Media & Entertainment
										

 Medical Malpractice
										

 Mergers & Acquisitions
										

 Native American
										

 New Jersey
										

 New York
										

 Pennsylvania
										

 Private Equity
										

 Product Liability
										

 Project Finance
										

 Public Policy
										

 Real Estate
										

 Retail & E Commerce
										

 Securities
										

 Sports
										

 Tax
										

 Technology
										

 Telecommunications
										

 Texas
										

 Transportation
										

 Trials
										

 White Collar
										





Register




Already have access?




Email:



Password:

Forgot your password?


Remember login



Sign In























Wmi Liquidating Trust Agreement - Trust Agreement - Free Search.
















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Trust Agreement     > WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENT

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents











SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>

















Wmi Liquidating Trust Agreement
Trust Agreement



You are currently viewing:
 This Trust Agreement involves WMI HOLDINGS CORP. | CSC Trust Company | Kirschner Consulting Company | One Financial | PPM America, Inc | Trust Advisory Board | Washington Mutual, Inc | Wells Fargo Bank, NA | WMI Investment Corp. RealDealDocs™ contains millions of easily searchable legal documents and clauses from top law firms. Search for free - click here.  
                  



Title: WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENT Date: 3/12/2012 Industry: SandLs/Savings Banks      Law Firm: Brown Rudnick;Weil Gotshal;Quinn Emanuel      Sector: Financial









Preview

Edit & Save 

Related Documents 



50 of the Top 250 law firms use our Products every day










 


EXHIBIT
10.1

 


EXECUTION VERSION
 
WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST
AGREEMENT

 


WMI LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENT, dated as of March 5, 2012 (this
“ Trust Agreement ”), is by and among Washington
Mutual, Inc. (“ WMI ”) and WMI Investment Corp.
(“ WMI Investment ” and, together with WMI, the
“ Debtors ”), as debtors and
debtors-in-possession, William C. Kosturos, as liquidating trustee
(together with any successor or additional trustee appointed under
the terms hereof, the “ Liquidating Trustee ”),
and CSC Trust Company of Delaware as the Delaware resident trustee
(together with any successor Delaware resident trustee appointed
under the terms hereof, the “ Resident Trustee ”
and collectively with the Liquidating Trustee, the “
Trustees ”) of the WMI Liquidating Trust (the “
Liquidating Trust ”).  Capitalized terms
used but not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings
ascribed to such terms in the Debtors’ Seventh Amended Joint
Plan of Affiliated Debtors Pursuant to Chapter 11 of the United
States Bankruptcy Code, dated December 12, 2011, as confirmed
(including all exhibits thereto, as the same may be further
amended, modified, or supplemented from time to time, the “
Plan ”).

 

BACKGROUND

 


A.           On
September 26, 2008, the Debtors filed voluntary petitions for
relief under chapter 11 of the Bankruptcy Code in the Bankruptcy
Court.

 


B.           On
December 12, 2011, the Debtors filed the Plan and the disclosure
statement relating to the Plan (as amended, the “
Disclosure Statement ”) with the Bankruptcy Court.

 


C.           On
February 24, 2012, the Bankruptcy Court entered an order confirming
the Plan (the “ Confirmation Order ”).

 


D.           The
Plan provides for the creation of a liquidating trust on or before
the Effective Date to hold, manage and administer the Liquidating
Trust Assets and distribute the proceeds thereof, if any, to the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, in accordance with the terms of
this Trust Agreement, the Plan and the Confirmation Order.

 


E.           The
Liquidating Trust is being created on behalf of, and for the
benefit of, the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries.

 


F.           The
Liquidating Trustee shall have all powers necessary to implement
the provisions of this Trust Agreement and administer the
Liquidating Trust, including, without limitation, the power to:
(i) prosecute for the benefit of the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries through Trust Professionals (as defined herein) any
causes of action that may from time to time be held by the
Liquidating Trust; (ii) preserve, maintain and liquidate the
Liquidating Trust Assets; (iii) distribute the Liquidating Trust
proceeds to the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries; and
(iv) otherwise perform the functions and take the actions
provided for in this Trust Agreement or permitted in the Plan
and/or the Confirmation Order or in any other agreement executed
pursuant to the Plan, in each case

 

 


 



 





 


 
subject to the
provisions of Sections 6.3 , 6.4 , 6.5 and
6.6 of this Trust Agreement regarding limitation on the
Liquidating Trustee and the oversight and consent rights of the
Trust Advisory Board (as defined herein), the Litigation
Subcommittee (as defined herein) and the Bankruptcy Court as
provided for herein.

 


G.           The
Liquidating Trust is organized for the sole purpose of liquidating
and distributing the Liquidating Trust Assets, with no objective to
conduct a trade or business except to the extent reasonably
necessary to, and consistent with, the liquidating purpose of the
Liquidating Trust.

 


H.           The
Liquidating Trust is intended to qualify as a “liquidating
trust” under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended
(the “ IRC ”) and the regulations promulgated
thereunder (the “ Treasury Regulations ”),
specifically Treasury Regulations section 301.7701-4(d) and, as
such, as a “grantor trust” for United States federal
income tax purposes with the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries
treated as the grantors and owners of the Liquidating Trust.

 

AGREEMENT

 


NOW, THEREFORE , in consideration of the promises and the
mutual covenants contained herein, the Debtors and the Liquidating
Trustee agree as follows:

 

ARTICLE I
 
DECLARATION OF
TRUST

 


1.1 
  Creation of Trust .  The Debtors and
the Liquidating Trustee, pursuant to the Plan and the Confirmation
Order and in accordance with the applicable provisions of chapter
11 of the Bankruptcy Code, hereby constitute and create the
Liquidating Trust, which shall bear the name “WMI Liquidating
Trust.”  In connection with the exercise of the
Liquidating Trustee’s power hereunder, the Liquidating
Trustee may use this name or such variation thereof as the
Liquidating Trustee sees fit.


 


1.2 
  Purpose of Liquidating Trust .  The
sole purpose of the Liquidating Trust is to implement the Plan on
behalf, and for the benefit, of the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries, and to serve as a mechanism for liquidating,
converting to Cash and distributing the Liquidating Trust Assets in
accordance with Treasury Regulations section 301.7701-4(d), with no
objective to continue or engage in the conduct of a trade or
business, except to the extent reasonably necessary to, and
consistent with, the liquidating purpose of the Liquidating
Trust.


 


1.3 
  Transfer of Liquidating Trust Assets
.  On the Effective Date, the Debtors shall transfer, for
the sole benefit of the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, pursuant
to Bankruptcy Code sections 1123(a)(5)(B) and 1123(b)(3)(B) and in
accordance with the Plan and the Confirmation Order, the
Liquidating Trust Assets to the Liquidating Trust, free and clear
of any and all liens, claims, encumbrances and interests (legal,
beneficial or


 

 


 



2





 


 
otherwise) of all
other entities to the maximum extent contemplated by and
permissible under Bankruptcy Code section 1141(c); provided
, however , that the Liquidating Trust Assets may be
transferred subject to certain liabilities, as provided in the
Plan, Confirmation Order or as otherwise provided
herein.  On the Effective Date, there shall be set aside
out of the Liquidating Trust Assets the amount of Cash that was
reasonably determined by the Debtors and the Creditors’
Committee following consultation with the Equity Committee prior to
the Effective Date to be necessary to fund the activities of the
Liquidating Trust, which amount shall be Sixty Million Dollars
($60,000,000.00) (the “ Funding ”);
provided , however , that the Funding may be
increased from time to time during the term of the Liquidating
Trust upon the request of the Liquidating Trustee and the approval
of a Supermajority of the Trust Advisory Board.  A
“Supermajority” shall mean the affirmative vote of
seven (7) of the nine (9) members of the Trust Advisory Board
(excluding the Holdco Member); provided , however ,
that if the Trust Advisory Board is reduced to five (5) members
pursuant to Section 6.4(e) , a “Supermajority”
shall mean the affirmative vote of three (3) of the five (5)
members of the Trust Advisory Board.  Twenty Million
Dollars ($20,000,000.00) of the Funding (the “ Litigation
Funding ”) shall be allocated to the Litigation
Subcommittee, with both the first Ten Million Dollars
($10,000,000.00) of the Litigation Funding and the second Ten
Million Dollars ($10,000,000.00) of the Litigation Funding (the
“ Second Tranche ”) to be used for the
prosecution of the Recovery Claims (as defined herein);
provided , however , that, prior to the allocation
and use of any portion of the Second Tranche, the Litigation
Subcommittee shall obtain the approval of the Trust Advisory Board
as to the reasonable expenditure of such funds; provided ,
further , that the Litigation Funding may be increased
during the term of the Liquidating Trust upon the request of the
Litigation Subcommittee and the approval of a Supermajority of the
Trust Advisory Board, which approval may be granted or withheld by
the Trust Advisory Board in its sole and absolute discretion, and
provided that any additional Litigation Funding that is approved
shall be deducted from any remaining portion of the Administrative
Funding (as defined herein); provided , further ,
that nothing herein shall preclude the Trust Advisory Board or the
Litigation Subcommittee from seeking additional financing from
sources other than the Liquidating Trust Assets in the discharge of
their fiduciary duties; provided , further , that any
portion of the Funding, including the Litigation Funding, that is
not used to fund the activities of the Liquidating Trust shall be
distributed in accordance with Section 4.3
hereof.  The transfer of the Liquidating Trust Assets
shall be exempt from any stamp, real estate transfer, mortgage
reporting, sales, use or other similar Tax, pursuant to section
1146(a) of the Bankruptcy Code.  Upon delivery of all
Liquidating Trust Assets to the Liquidating Trust, the Debtors
shall be discharged and released from all liability with respect to
the delivery of such distributions, and exculpated as provided in
Section 41.8 of the Plan.  In connection with the receipt
of the Liquidating Trust Assets, the Liquidating Trust shall
acquire and assume all of WMI’s rights and obligations
pursuant to Section 2.4 of the Global Settlement Agreement, and WMI
shall have no further liability or obligations
thereunder.  The Liquidating Trust Assets and all other
property held from time to time by the Liquidating Trust under this
Trust Agreement and any earnings, including without limitation,
interest, on any of the foregoing are to be applied by the
Liquidating Trustee in accordance with the terms hereof, the Plan
and the

 

 


 



3





 


 
Confirmation Order
for the benefit of the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, and for no
other party, subject to the further covenants, conditions and terms
hereinafter set forth.

 


1.4 
  Appointment and Acceptance of Liquidating
Trustee .  As set forth in the Confirmation Order,
the members of the Trust Advisory Board hereby designate William C.
Kosturos in connection with the applicable provisions of the
Delaware Statutory Trust Act, 12 Del. C. § 3801
et seq ., as the same may from time to time be
amended, or any successor statute (the “ Trust Act
”) to serve as the initial Liquidating Trustee under the
Plan.  The Liquidating Trustee shall be deemed to be
appointed pursuant to Bankruptcy Code section
1123(b)(3)(B).  The Liquidating Trustee accepts the
Liquidating Trust created by this Trust Agreement and the grant,
assignment, transfer, conveyance and delivery to the Liquidating
Trustee, on behalf, and for the benefit, of the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries, by the Debtors of all of their respective right,
title and interest in the Liquidating Trust Assets, upon and
subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, in the Plan
and in the Confirmation Order.  The Liquidating
Trustee’s powers are exercisable solely in a fiduciary
capacity consistent with, and in furtherance of, the purpose of the
Liquidating Trust and not otherwise.  The Liquidating
Trustee shall have the authority to bind the Liquidating Trust
within the limitations set forth herein, but shall for all purposes
hereunder be acting in the capacity as Liquidating Trustee, and not
individually.


 


1.5 
  Liquidation of Liquidating Trust Assets
.  The Liquidating Trustee shall, in an expeditious but
commercially reasonable manner and subject to the provisions of the
Plan (including, without limitation, Section 31.14 of the Plan),
the Confirmation Order and the other provisions of this Trust
Agreement, liquidate and convert to Cash the Liquidating Trust
Assets, make timely distributions in accordance with the terms
hereof and the Plan and not unduly prolong the existence of the
Liquidating Trust.  The Liquidating Trustee shall
exercise reasonable business judgment and liquidate the Liquidating
Trust Assets to maximize net recoveries; provided ,
however , that the Liquidating Trustee shall be entitled to
take into consideration the risks, timing, and costs of potential
actions in making determinations as to the maximization of
recoveries and the determinations and actions of the Liquidating
Trustee shall in all cases be subject to the limitations provided
elsewhere herein.  Subject to the terms of this Trust
Agreement, such liquidations may be accomplished through the
prosecution, compromise and settlement, abandonment or dismissal of
any or all claims, rights or causes of action of the Liquidating
Trust or through the sale or other disposition of the Liquidating
Trust Assets (in whole or in combination, and including the sale of
any claims, rights or causes of action of the Liquidating
Trust).  The Liquidating Trustee may incur any reasonable
and necessary expenses in connection with the liquidation and
conversion of the Liquidating Trust Assets into Cash or in
connection with the administration of the Liquidating Trust and, to
the extent that any Administrative Funding (as defined herein) is
available, such expenses shall first be deducted from the
Administrative Funding.


 


1.6 
  No Reversion to Debtors .  In no
event shall any part of the Liquidating Trust Assets revert to or
be distributed to any Debtor or Reorganized Debtor.


 

 


 



4





 


 

1.7 
  Incidents of Ownership .  Except as
provided in Section 1.6 hereof, the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries shall be the sole beneficiaries of the Liquidating
Trust and the Liquidating Trust Assets, and the Liquidating Trustee
shall retain only such incidents of ownership as are necessary to
undertake the actions and transactions authorized herein, in the
Plan and in the Confirmation Order, including, but not limited to,
those powers set forth in Section 6.2 hereof.


 


1.8 
  Privileges and Obligation to Respond to Ongoing
Investigations .  All Privileges shall be
transferred, assigned, and delivered to the Liquidating Trust,
without waiver, and shall vest in the Liquidating Trustee solely in
its capacity as such (and any other individual whom the Liquidating
Trustee, with the consent of the Trust Advisory Board or the
Litigation Subcommittee, as applicable, may designate, it being
understood that, as of the date of this Trust Agreement, the
Liquidating Trustee shall designate the Trust Advisory Board and
the Litigation Subcommittee, solely in their capacities as such, as
well as any other individual designated in this Trust
Agreement).  Pursuant to Federal Rule of Evidence 502(d)
(to the extent Rule 502(d) is relevant notwithstanding the fact
that the Debtors, the Liquidating Trustee, the FDIC Receiver and
JPMC are joint holders of certain attorney-client privileges, work
product protections, or other immunities or protections from
disclosure), no Privileges shall be waived by disclosure to the
Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board and/or the Litigation
Subcommittee of the Debtors’ information subject to
attorney-client privileges, work product protections, or other
immunities or protections from disclosure, or by disclosure among
the Debtors, the Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the
Litigation Subcommittee, the FDIC Receiver, and/or JPMC of
information that is subject to attorney-client privileges, work
product protections, or other immunities or protections from
disclosure jointly held by the Debtors, the FDIC Receiver, the
Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation
Subcommittee and/or JPMC.  The Liquidating Trustee shall
be obligated to respond, on behalf of the Debtors, to all
Information Demands.  The FDIC Receiver and JPMC shall
take reasonable steps to cooperate with the Liquidating Trustee in
responding to Information Demands, and such cooperation shall
include, for example, taking all steps necessary to maintain and
avoid waiver of any and all Privileges (including, without
limitation, any Privileges that are shared jointly among or between
any of the parties).  The Liquidating Trustee, with the
consent of the Trust Advisory Board or the Litigation Subcommittee,
as applicable, may waive Privileges that are held solely by the
Debtors and/or the Liquidating Trust, but not jointly held with the
FDIC Receiver and/or JPMC, in the event and to the extent the
Liquidating Trustee, with the consent of the Trust Advisory Board
or the Litigation Subcommittee, as applicable, determines in good
faith that doing so is in the best interests of the Liquidating
Trust and its beneficiaries.  The Liquidating Trustee,
the FDIC Receiver and JPMC may disclose information that is subject
to attorney-client privileges, work product protections, or other
immunities or protections from disclosure that are jointly held
with the FDIC Receiver and/or JPMC only (i) upon written permission
from the Liquidating Trustee, the FDIC Receiver and JPMC, as the
case may be; (ii) pursuant to an order of a court of competent
jurisdiction, subject to the procedure described in the next
sentence insofar as it applies; or (iii) as otherwise required by
law, subject to the procedure


 

 


 



5





 


 
described in the
next sentence insofar as it applies.  If the Liquidating
Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation Subcommittee, the
FDIC Receiver or JPMC receives a request from a third party to
disclose information that is subject to attorney-client privileges,
work product protections, or other immunities or protections from
disclosure that are jointly held with the Liquidating Trustee, the
Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation Subcommittee, the FDIC
Receiver and/or JPMC, the party or parties who receives such
request will (w) pursue all reasonable steps to maintain the
applicable privileges or protections from disclosure, including, if
necessary, to maintain the privileges or protections from
disclosure by seeking a protective order against and/or otherwise
objecting to the production of such material, (x) notify the
Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation
Subcommittee, the FDIC Receiver and/or JPMC, as the case may be,
(y) allow the Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the
Litigation Subcommittee, the FDIC Receiver and/or JPMC, as the case
may be, reasonable time under the circumstances to seek a
protective order against and/or otherwise object to the production
of such material, and (z) unless required by law, not disclose the
materials in question unless and until any objection raised by the
Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation
Subcommittee, the FDIC Receiver and/or JPMC is resolved in favor of
disclosure.

 


1.9 
  Liquidating Trustee’s Administration and
Rights with Respect to Runoff Notes .  Until such
time as any Runoff Notes that are held by the Liquidating Trust are
distributed to any Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries entitled thereto
in accordance with the Plan, the Liquidating Trustee shall (i) not
sell, convey, dispose or otherwise transfer the Runoff Notes except
as expressly provided for in the Plan and (ii) exercise any
remedies available to Holders (as defined in the Indenture) under
the Indenture or any Security Document (as defined in the
Indenture) as the Liquidating Trustee deems necessary and advisable
solely to protect the interests of such Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries.


 

ARTICLE II

 

LIQUIDATING TRUST
BENEFICIARIES

 


2.1 
  Conflicting Claims .  If any
conflicting claims or demands are made or asserted with respect to
a Liquidating Trust Interest, the Liquidating Trustee shall be
entitled, at his sole election, to refuse to comply with any such
conflicting claims or demands.  In so refusing, the
Liquidating Trustee, at his sole election, may elect to make no
payment or distribution with respect to the Liquidating Trust
Interest subject to the claims or demands involved, or any part
thereof, and the Liquidating Trustee shall refer such conflicting
claims or demands to the Bankruptcy Court, which shall have
exclusive jurisdiction over resolution of such conflicting claims
or demands.  In so doing, the Liquidating Trustee shall
not be or become liable to any party for its refusal to comply with
any of such conflicting claims or demands.  The
Liquidating Trustee shall be entitled to refuse to act until either
(i) the rights of the adverse claimants have been adjudicated by a
Final Order of the Bankruptcy Court (or such other court of proper
jurisdiction) or (ii) all differences have been resolved by a
written agreement among all


 

 


 



6





 


 
of such parties and
the Liquidating Trustee, which agreement shall include a complete
release of the Liquidating Trust and the Liquidating Trustee (the
occurrence of either (i) or (ii) in this Section 2.1 being
referred to as a “ Dispute Resolution
”).  Promptly after a Dispute Resolution is
reached, the Liquidating Trustee shall transfer the payments and
distributions, if any, together with any interest thereon to be
paid in accordance with Section 4.6 hereof, in accordance
with the terms of such Dispute Resolution.  Any payment
of any interest or income should be net of any taxes attributable
thereto in accordance with Section 5.4 .

 


2.2 
  Rights of Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries
.  Each Liquidating Trust Beneficiary shall be entitled
to participate in the rights and benefits due to a Liquidating
Trust Beneficiary hereunder according to the terms of its
Liquidating Trust Interest.  The interest of a
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary is hereby declared and shall be in
all respects personal property.  Except as expressly
provided hereunder, a Liquidating Trust Beneficiary shall have no
title to, right to, possession of, management of or control of the
Liquidating Trust or the Liquidating Trust Assets or to any right
to call for a partition or division of such assets or to require an
accounting.  No surviving spouse, heir or devisee of any
deceased Liquidating Trust Beneficiary shall have any right of
dower, homestead or inheritance, or of partition, or any other
right, statutory or otherwise, in the Liquidating Trust Assets, but
the whole title to the Liquidating Trust Assets shall be vested in
the Liquidating Trustee and the sole interest of the Liquidating
Trust Beneficiaries shall be the rights and benefits given to such
person under this Trust Agreement and the Plan.


 


2.3 
  Evidence of Liquidating Trust Interest
.  Ownership of a Liquidating Trust Interest in the
Liquidating Trust will be evidenced by the recording of such
ownership in an electronic book-entry system (the “ Book
Entry System ”) maintained either by the Liquidating
Trust or an agent of the Liquidating Trust.  A
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary shall be deemed the “holder of
record” (hereinafter “ holder ”) of such
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary’s Liquidating Trust Interest(s)
for purposes of all applicable United States federal and state
laws, rules and regulations.  The Liquidating Trustee shall,
upon the written request of a holder of a Liquidating Trust
Interest, provide reasonably adequate documentary evidence of such
holder’s Liquidating Trust Interest, as indicated in the Book
Entry System.  The expense of providing such
documentation shall be borne by the requesting holder.


 


2.4 
  Transfers of Liquidating Trust Interests .


 


(a) 
  General .  Liquidating Trust
Interests shall not be transferable or assignable except by will,
intestate succession or operation of law.


 


(b) 
  Book Entry System .  Pursuant to the
Book Entry System, the Liquidating Trust shall maintain, or cause
the agent of the Liquidating Trust to maintain, a register (which
may be electronic) setting forth the names and addresses of the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, and the amount and class of their
Liquidating Trust Interests from time to time.  Any
transfer or assignment of a Liquidating Trust Interest by will,
intestate succession or operation of law shall not be effective
unless and until such


 

 


 



7





 


 
transfer or
assignment is recorded in the Book Entry System, which shall be
completed as soon as practicable.  Subject to Section
2.4(d), the entries in the Book Entry System shall be conclusive
absent manifest error, and the Liquidating Trust and the
Liquidating Trustee shall treat each person whose name is recorded
in the Book Entry System pursuant to the terms hereof as the owner
of Liquidating Trust Interests indicated therein for all purposes
of this Trust Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the
contrary.

 


(c) 
  Registration .  If the Liquidating
Trustee, with the consent of the Trust Advisory Board and upon
advice of counsel, determines that any class of Liquidating Trust
Interests may be subject to registration pursuant to section 12 of
the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the “
Exchange Act ”), the Liquidating Trustee shall pursue
relief from such registration by obtaining either an exemptive
order, a no-action letter or an interpretive letter from the
Securities and Exchange Commission or its staff or, absent its
ability to achieve that objective or in lieu thereof, shall
register such class pursuant to section 12 of such statute (it
being understood and agreed that the Liquidating Trustee with the
consent of the Trust Advisory Board shall be authorized, among
other things, to register such class and to seek relief from one or
more of the requirements then applicable subsequent to such
registration  and to de-register such
class).  To the extent that any Administrative Funding is
available, any expenses that are associated with such application
for relief and/or registration shall first be deducted from the
Administrative Funding.


 


(d) 
  Further Limitations on Transfer
.  Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary,
the Liquidating Trustee may disregard any purported transfer or
assignment of Liquidating Trust Interests by will, intestate
succession or operation of law if sufficient necessary information
(as reasonably determined by the Liquidating Trustee), including
applicable Tax-related information, is not provided by such
purported transferee or assignee to the Liquidating Trustee.


 


2.5 
  Limited Liability .  No provision of
this Trust Agreement, the Plan or the Confirmation Order, and no
mere enumeration herein of the rights or privileges of any
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary, shall give rise to any liability of
such Liquidating Trust Beneficiary solely in its capacity as such,
whether such liability is asserted by any Debtor, by creditors,
employees, or equity interest holders of any Debtor, or by any
other Person.  Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries are deemed
to receive the Liquidating Trust Assets in accordance with the
provisions of this Trust Agreement, the Plan and the Confirmation
Order in exchange for their Allowed Claims or Equity Interests, as
applicable, without further obligation or liability of any kind,
but subject to the provisions of this Trust Agreement.


 

 


 



8





 


 

 

ARTICLE III

 

DURATION AND
TERMINATION OF LIQUIDATING TRUST

 


3.1 
  Duration .  The Liquidating Trust
shall become effective upon the Effective Date of the Plan and
shall remain and continue in full force and effect until dissolved
as provided for in Section 27.14(d) of the Plan.


 


3.2 
  Dissolution of the Liquidating Trust
.  The Liquidating Trustee and the Liquidating Trust
shall be discharged or dissolved, as the case may be, on the
earlier to occur of (i) all of the Liquidating Trust Assets having
been distributed pursuant to the Plan and this Trust Agreement,
(ii) the Liquidating Trustee having determined, with the consent of
the Trust Advisory Board, that the administration of any remaining
Liquidating Trust Assets is not likely to yield sufficient
additional Liquidating Trust proceeds to justify further pursuit,
or (iii) all distributions required to be made by the Liquidating
Trustee under the Plan and this Trust Agreement having been made;
provided , however , that in no event shall the
Liquidating Trust be dissolved later than three (3) years from the
Effective Date unless the Bankruptcy Court, upon motion within the
six-month period prior to the third (3rd) anniversary (or within
the six-month period prior to the end of any extension period),
determines that a fixed period extension (not to exceed three (3)
years, together with any prior extensions, without a favorable
private letter ruling from the IRS or an opinion of counsel
satisfactory to the Liquidating Trustee and the Trust Advisory
Board that any further extension would not adversely affect the
status of the trust as a liquidating trust for United States
federal income tax purposes) is necessary to facilitate or complete
the recovery and liquidation of the Liquidating Trust
Assets.  If at any time the Liquidating Trustee
determines, in reliance upon such Trust Professionals as the
Liquidating Trustee may retain, that the expense of administering
the Liquidating Trust so as to make a final distribution to the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries is likely to exceed the value of
the assets remaining in the Liquidating Trust, the Liquidating
Trustee may apply to the Bankruptcy Court for authority to (i)
reserve any amount necessary to dissolve the Liquidating Trust,
(ii) donate any balance to a charitable organization (A) of the
type described in section 501(c)(3) of the IRC, (B) exempt from
United States federal income tax under section 501(a) of the IRC,
(C) that is not a “private foundation”, as defined in
section 509(a) of the IRC, and (D) that is unrelated to the
Debtors, the Reorganized Debtors, the Liquidating Trust, and any
insider of the Liquidating Trustee, and (iii) dissolve the
Liquidating Trust.  Upon receipt of such authority from
the Bankruptcy Court, the Liquidating Trustee shall (X) notify each
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary, (Y) file a Certificate of
Cancellation with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware
and (Z) provide a copy of the evidence of such cancellation to the
Resident Trustee.


 


3.3 
  Continuance of Liquidating Trust for Winding
Up .  After the dissolution of the Liquidating Trust
and solely for the purpose of liquidating and winding up the
affairs of the Liquidating Trust, the Liquidating Trustee shall
continue to act as such until its duties have been fully
performed.  Upon distribution of all the Liquidating
Trust Assets, the Liquidating Trustee shall retain the books,
records and files that shall


 

 


 



9





 


 
have been delivered
to or created by the Liquidating Trustee.  At the
Liquidating Trustee’s discretion, all of such records and
documents may be destroyed at any time following the date that is
six (6) years after the final distribution of the Liquidating Trust
Assets, subject to any joint prosecution and common interests
agreement(s) to which the Liquidating Trustee may be party.

 

ARTICLE IV

 

ADMINISTRATION OF
LIQUIDATING TRUST

 


4.1 
  Payment of Claims, Expenses and Liabilities
.  Subject to the Budget (as defined below) from time to
time approved by the Trust Advisory Board in accordance with
Section 4.14(b) hereof, and subject to the approval of the
Bankruptcy Court in accordance with Sections 6.4(m) ,
6.5(k), 6.8(b) , 6.11(c) and 7.7 , and except
as otherwise provided herein, the Liquidating Trustee shall use the
Funding (i) to pay reasonable costs and expenses of the Liquidating
Trust that are incurred (including, but not limited to, the costs
and expenses associated with the administration of the Disputed
Equity Escrow (excluding any Taxes), any Taxes imposed on the
Liquidating Trust, the actual reasonable out-of-pocket fees and
expenses incurred by Trust Professionals in connection with the
administration and liquidation of the Liquidating Trust Assets, as
provided in Section 6.8 hereof, and the preservation of
books and records of the Liquidating Trust); (ii) to satisfy other
obligations or other liabilities incurred or assumed by the
Liquidating Trust (or to which the Liquidating Trust Assets are
otherwise subject) in accordance with the Plan, the Confirmation
Order, the Global Settlement Agreement or this Trust Agreement,
including fees and costs incurred in connection with the
protection, preservation, liquidation and distribution of the
Liquidating Trust Assets and the costs of investigating,
prosecuting, resolving and/or settling any Claims; (iii) as
reasonably necessary to meet contingent liabilities and to maintain
the value of the Liquidating Trust Assets during liquidation, (iv)
to satisfy any other obligations of the Liquidating Trust expressly
set forth in the Plan, this Trust Agreement, the Confirmation
Order, and the Global Settlement Agreement.


 


4.2 
  BB Liquidating Trust Interests .  On
the Effective Date, the Liquidating Trustee shall immediately
distribute the funds on account of the BB Liquidating Trust
Interests, subject to consensual release by the parties pursuant to
Section 2.4 of the Global Settlement Agreement of such funds from
the tax escrow account.


 


4.3 
  Distributions .


 


(a) 
  Generally .  Subject to Section
4.4(b) hereof, the Liquidating Trustee is required to
distribute to the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries on account of
their Liquidating Trust Interests, on each Distribution Date (as
defined below) all unrestricted Cash then on hand (including any
Cash received from the Debtors on the Effective Date, and treating
any permissible investment as Cash for purposes of this Section
4.3 ), except (i) the Funding, (ii) such other amounts as are
allocable to or retained


 

 


 



10





 


 
on account of
Disputed Claims in accordance with Section 26.3 of the Plan, and
(iii) after taking into account the Funding, such additional
amounts (A) as are reasonably necessary to meet contingent
liabilities and to maintain the value of the Liquidating Trust
Assets pending their liquidation during the term of the Liquidating
Trust, (B) as are necessary to pay reasonably incurred or
anticipated expenses (including, but not limited to, any Taxes
imposed on or payable by the Debtors or the Liquidating Trust or in
respect of the Liquidating Trust Assets), or (C) as are necessary
to satisfy other liabilities incurred or anticipated by the
Liquidating Trust in accordance with the Plan, the Global
Settlement Agreement, or this Trust Agreement; provided ,
that the amounts listed in clause (iii) shall be subject to the
approval of a Supermajority of the Trust Advisory Board;
provided , further , that the Liquidating Trustee
shall not be required to make a distribution pursuant to this
Section 4.3 if the aggregate, net amount of unrestricted
Cash available for distribution (taking into account the above
listed exclusions) is such as would make the distribution
impracticable as reasonably determined by the Liquidating Trustee,
with the consent of the Trust Advisory Board, in accordance with
applicable law, and so long as such aggregate amount is less than
Twenty-Five Million Dollars ($25,000,000.00); and provided ,
further , that the Liquidating Trustee, with consent of the
Trust Advisory Board, may decide to forego the first quarterly
distribution to those Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries with respect
to which the Liquidating Trustee, in its reasonable judgment, is
not administratively prepared to make such distribution, in which
case, such distribution shall be made to such holders as soon as
practicable after the Liquidating Trustee is administratively
prepared to do so.  “Distribution Date” means
the 1st day of the second month in each fiscal quarter during the
term of the Liquidating Trust or such other dates that the
Liquidating Trustee determines, in consultation with the Trust
Advisory Board, are appropriate from time to time; provided
, however , that there shall be at least one such date in
each fiscal quarter during the term of the Liquidating Trust.

 


(b) 
  Payment of Distributions .  Subject
to Section 4.2 , each Liquidating Trust Beneficiary’s
share of the Liquidating Trust Interests as determined pursuant to
the Plan (including any Cash to be received on account of any
Liquidating Trust Interests) shall be allocated and distributed,
and the Liquidating Trust Assets shall be allocated and
distributed, in accordance with Article XXXI of the Plan and
Annex C hereto.  Any distribution that is to be
made to a Liquidating Trust Beneficiary who elected to forego fifty
percent (50%) of such Liquidating Trust Beneficiary’s
Litigation Proceeds Interest shall be adjusted as required pursuant
to Sections 6.2(b), 7.2(b), 16.2(b)(ii), 18.2(b), 19.1(b) and 20.2
of the Plan.


 


(c) 
  De Minimis Distributions .  No Cash
payment shall be made to any holder of a Liquidating Trust Interest
until such time, if ever, as the amount payable thereto, in any
distribution from the Liquidating Trust, is equal to or greater
than ten dollars ($10.00).  Any holder of a Liquidating
Trust Interest on account of which the amount of Cash to be
distributed pursuant to any distribution from the Liquidating Trust
is less than ten dollars ($10.00) shall be deemed to have no claim
for such distribution against the Debtors, the Reorganized Debtors,
the Liquidating Trust or the Liquidating Trust
Assets.  Subject to Section 4.6 hereof, any Cash
not distributed pursuant to this


 

 


 



11





 


 
Section 4.3
shall be the property of the Liquidating Trust free of any
restrictions thereon, and shall be available for distribution to
the other Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, in accordance with the
Plan and this Trust Agreement.

 


(d) 
  Runoff Notes .  To the extent the
Liquidating Trust Assets include Runoff Notes that are not
allocable to the Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve, the Liquidating
Trustee shall distribute such Runoff Notes in accordance with
Section 31.14 of the Plan.


 


 


4.4 
  Undeliverable Property .


 


(a) 
  Holding of Undeliverable Distributions
:  For purposes of this Trust Agreement, an
“undeliverable” distribution shall include, without
limitation, a check that is sent to a holder in respect of a
distribution to such holder, which check has not been negotiated
within six (6) months following the date on which such check was
issued.  Subject to Section 4.4(b) , if any
distribution to the holder of a Liquidating Trust Interest is
undeliverable, no further distribution shall be made to such holder
unless and until the Liquidating Trustee (or its duly authorized
agent) is notified, in writing, of such holder’s then-current
address.  Undeliverable distributions shall remain in the
possession of the Liquidating Trustee (or its duly authorized
agent) until such time as a distribution becomes deliverable or as
set forth in Section 4.4(b) below.  All Entities
ultimately receiving an undeliverable distribution shall not be
entitled to any interest or other accruals of any kind on account
of the delay in payment resulting from the undeliverable status of
such distribution.  Except as required by law, the
Liquidating Trustee (or its duly authorized agent) shall not be
required to attempt to locate any holder of a Liquidating Trust
Interest.


 


(b) 
  Failure to Claim Undeliverable Distributions
:  If (i) a check is sent to a holder in respect of a
distribution and such check is not negotiated within six (6) months
following the date on which the check was issued, or (ii) any other
form of distribution to a holder is otherwise undeliverable, the
Liquidating Trustee (or its duly authorized agent) shall, no later
than seven (7) months after the sending of the un-negotiated check
or other form of undeliverable distribution, send a written notice
(a “ Missing Holder Notice ”) to such holder at
the address shown on the Book Entry System with respect to such
holder.  The Missing Holder Notice shall state that (i)
the holder has been sent a check or other form of distribution that
has not yet been negotiated or is otherwise undeliverable, (ii) no
further distributions will be made to such holder unless and until
the Liquidating Trustee (or its duly authorized agent) is notified,
in writing, of such holder’s then-current address, and (iii)
that unless such holder notifies the Liquidating Trustee (or its
duly authorized agent) of the holder’s then-current address
within thirty (30) days of the date of the Missing Holder Notice,
such holder shall have its entitlement to such undeliverable
distribution and the Liquidating Trust Interest or Interests to
which such undeliverable distribution relates cancelled and shall
be forever barred from asserting any entitlement with respect
thereto pursuant to the Plan, this Trust Agreement or otherwise
against the Debtors, the Reorganized Debtors, the Liquidating


 

 


 



12





 


 
Trust, or their
respective property.  In such case, any consideration
held for distribution on account of such Liquidating Trust
Interest(s) shall revert to the Liquidating Trustee for
redistribution to other holders of Liquidating Trust Interests in
accordance with the terms and provisions of this Trust Agreement,
the Plan and the Confirmation Order.

 


4.5 
  Interest on Liquidating Trust Interest
s.  As set forth in the Plan, interest shall not accrue
and be paid on the Liquidating Trust Interests themselves, but only
with respect to and to the extent provided in the Plan with respect
to an Allowed Claim (“ Interest
”).  Interest may, as an incremental adjustment on
the maximum amount the Liquidating Trust distributes in respect of
a Liquidating Trust Interest, accrue up to and including the date
of final payment in full of the Allowed Claim related to the
Liquidating Trust Interest as provided in the Plan.


 


4.6 
  Setoffs .  The Liquidating Trustee
may, pursuant to applicable bankruptcy or non-bankruptcy law, set
off against any Liquidating Trust Interest and the distributions to
be made pursuant to the Plan on account thereof (before any
distribution is made on account of such Liquidating Trust Interest
by the Liquidating Trustee), the claims, rights, and causes of
action of any nature that one or more of the Debtors, Debtors in
Possession, the Liquidating Trustee or the Reorganized Debtors may
hold against the holder of such Allowed Claim; provided ,
however , that neither the failure to effect such a setoff
nor the allowance of any Claim hereunder shall constitute a waiver
or release by the Debtors, Debtors in Possession, the Liquidating
Trustee or the Reorganized Debtors of any such claims, rights, and
causes of action that the Debtors, Debtors in Possession, the
Liquidating Trustee or the Reorganized Debtors may possess against
such holder; and, provided , further , that nothing
contained herein is intended to limit the ability of any
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary to effectuate rights of setoff or
recoupment preserved or permitted by the provisions of sections
553, 555, 559, or 560 of the Bankruptcy Code or pursuant to the
common law right of recoupment.


 


4.7 
  Distributions After the Effective Date
.  Distributions made after the Effective Date to holders
of Liquidating Trust Interests on account of Claims that are not
Allowed Claims as of the Effective Date, but which later become
Allowed Claims, shall be deemed to have been made in accordance
with the terms and provisions of Article XXXI of the Plan.


 


4.8 
  Compliance with Laws .  Any and all
distributions of Liquidating Trust Assets shall be in compliance
with applicable laws, including but not limited to, applicable
federal and state tax and securities laws.


 


4.9 
  Fiscal Year .  Except for the first
and last years of the Liquidating Trust, the fiscal year of the
Liquidating Trust shall be the calendar year.  For the
first and last years of the Liquidating Trust, the fiscal year of
the Liquidating Trust shall be such portion of the calendar year
that the Liquidating Trust is in existence.


 


4.10 
  Books and Records .  The Liquidating
Trustee shall retain and preserve the Debtors’ books, records
and files that shall have been delivered to or created


 

 


 



13





 


 
by the Liquidating
Trustee.  Subject to Section 3.3 hereof, the Liquidating
Trustee shall maintain, in respect of the Liquidating Trust and the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries and all others to receive
distributions under this Trust Agreement, books and records
relating to the assets and the income of the Liquidating Trust and
the payment of expenses of, liabilities of, and claims against or
assumed by, the Liquidating Trust and the Liquidating Trustee, in
such detail and for such period of time as may be necessary to
enable it to make full and proper reports in respect thereof in
accordance with the provisions of this Trust Agreement and
applicable provisions of law, including but not limited to
applicable Tax, securities and other federal and state
laws.  Except as otherwise provided herein or in the
Plan, nothing in this Trust Agreement requires the Liquidating
Trustee to file any accounting or seek approval of any court with
respect to the administration of the Liquidating Trust, or as a
condition for making any payment or distribution out of the
Liquidating Trust Assets.  The Liquidating Trustee shall
provide any member of the Trust Advisory Board with access to such
books and records during normal business hours as may be reasonably
requested with five (5) days’ advance
notice.  Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries shall have the
right upon thirty (30) days’ prior written notice delivered
to the Liquidating Trustee to inspect such books and records;
provided , that, if so requested, all costs associated with
such inspection shall be paid in advance by such requesting
Liquidating Trust Beneficiary and such Liquidating Trust
Beneficiary shall have entered into a confidentiality agreement
reasonably satisfactory in form and substance to the Liquidating
Trustee.

 


4.11 
  Cash Payments .  Subject to Section
26.3 of the Plan and Section 4.3(d) hereof, all
distributions required to be made by the Liquidating Trustee to the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries shall be made in Cash denominated
in United States dollars by checks drawn on a domestic bank
selected by the Liquidating Trustee or, at the option of the
Liquidating Trustee, by wire transfer from a domestic bank selected
by the Liquidating Trustee or as otherwise required or provided in
applicable agreements; provided , however , that Cash
payments to foreign holders of Liquidating Trust Interests may be
made, at the option of the Liquidating Trustee, in such funds as
and by such means as are necessary or customary in a particular
foreign jurisdiction.


 


4.12 
  Insurance .  The Liquidating Trust
shall maintain customary insurance coverage for the protection of
the Liquidating Trustee, the members of the Trust Advisory Board,
employees and any such other persons serving as administrators and
overseers of the Liquidating Trust on and after the Effective
Date.  The Liquidating Trustee also may obtain insurance
coverage it deems necessary and appropriate with respect to real
and personal property which may become Liquidating Trust Assets, if
any.


 


4.13 
  Disputes .  To the extent a dispute
arises between the Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board
and/or the Litigation Subcommittee concerning the performance of
any of the powers, duties, and/or obligations herein, the
Liquidating Trustee, the Trust Advisory Board or the Litigation
Subcommittee may file a motion and/or other pleadings with the
Bankruptcy Court and obtain advice and guidance or such other
relief as may be appropriate concerning a resolution of the
matter(s) in dispute between the parties.  In the event
of a dispute, the Liquidating Trustee, the Trust


 

 


 



14





 


 
Advisory Board and
the Litigation Subcommittee, as applicable, shall have the right to
engage legal counsel to advise it with respect to the matter(s) in
dispute and the reasonable fees and expenses of such legal counsel
shall be reimbursed by the Liquidating Trustee from the Funding
(excluding the Litigation Funding, the “ Administrative
Funding ”)) or, in the event the Administrative Funding
has been spent, any other unrestricted Cash in the Liquidating
Trust, subject to the approval of a Supermajority of the Trust
Advisory Board and subject to Section 7.6 hereof.

 


4.14 
  Reports .


 


(a) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall deliver reports to
members of the Trust Advisory Board not later than thirty (30) days
following the end of each fiscal quarter.  Such reports
shall specify in reasonable detail (i) the status of any Causes of
Action, Claims and litigation involving the Liquidating Trust or
the Liquidating Trust Assets, including, without limitation,
Avoidance Actions, including any settlements entered into by the
Liquidating Trust, (ii) the costs and expenses of the Liquidating
Trust that are incurred (including, but not limited to, any Taxes
imposed on the Liquidating Trust or actual reasonable out-of-pocket
fees and expenses incurred by Trust Professionals in connection
with the administration and liquidation of the Liquidating Trust
Assets and preservation of books and records as provided in
Section 4.10 hereof) during the preceding fiscal quarter and
the remaining amount (if any) of the Administrative Funding and the
Litigation Funding, (iii) the amounts listed in clause (ii)
incurred since the Effective Date, (iv) the amount of Cash and
other assets received by the Liquidating Trust during the prior
fiscal quarter, (v) the Liquidating Trustee’s estimate as of
the end of the most recent fiscal quarter of the uncollected Tax
Refunds and all other Liquidating Trust Assets, (vi) the aggregate
amount of Cash and other assets received by the Liquidating Trust
since the Effective Date, (vii) the calculation of the estimated
amount of the Cash and other assets to be distributed on the next
Distribution Date, including any Cash on hand that is not to be
distributed pursuant to Section 4.3(a) above, (viii) the
aggregate amount of distributions from the Liquidating Trust to the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries since the Effective Date, and (ix)
such other information as the Trust Advisory Board or the
Litigation Subcommittee may reasonably request from time to
time.  The Liquidating Trustee shall also timely prepare,
file and distribute such additional statements, reports and
submissions (A) as may be necessary to cause the Liquidating Trust
and the Liquidating Trustee to be in compliance with applicable law
or (B) as may be otherwise reasonably requested from time to time
by the Trust Advisory Board.


 


(b) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall prepare and submit to
the Trust Advisory Board (or, pursuant to Section 6.5(c)(z)
, the Litigation Subcommittee, as applicable) for approval an
annual plan and budget at least thirty (30) days prior to the
commencement of each fiscal year of the Liquidating Trust;
provided , however , that the first such report shall
be submitted no later than forty-five (45) days after the Effective
Date of the Plan.  Such annual plan and budget shall set
forth in reasonable detail: (i) the Liquidating Trustee’s
anticipated actions to administer and liquidate the Liquidating
Trust Assets; and (ii) the anticipated expenses, including the
expenses of Trust


 

 


 



15





 


 
Professionals,
associated with conducting the affairs of the Liquidating
Trust.  Such annual plan and budget shall be updated and
submitted to the Trust Advisory Board (or, pursuant to Section
6.5(c)(z) , the Litigation Subcommittee) for review and
approval on a quarterly basis, and each such quarterly update shall
reflect the differences between the anticipated actions described
in the annual report and actual operations of the Liquidating Trust
to date.  Any such annual plan and budget as approved by
the Trust Advisory Board (or, pursuant to Section 6.5(c)(z)
, the Litigation Subcommittee) is referred to herein as the “
Budget ”.  All actions by the Liquidating
Trustee must be substantially consistent with the then current
Budget, provided that the Liquidating Trustee may take action
outside the Budget with the prior approval of the Trust Advisory
Board (or the Litigation Subcommittee with respect to Section
6.5(c)(z) ).

 


4.15 
  Until such time as the Liquidating Trust is dissolved
in accordance with Section 27.14(d) of the Plan (or otherwise in
accordance with this Agreement), the Liquidating Trust shall file
with (or furnish to, as the case may be) the Securities and
Exchange Commission (the “ SEC ”) such periodic
reports as the Liquidating Trust is required to file pursuant to
the Exchange Act.  In addition, until the Chapter 11
Cases are closed, the Liquidating Trust shall file
Post-Confirmation Quarterly Summary Reports for each of the Chapter
11 Cases with the Bankruptcy Court and, thereafter, and until such
time as the Liquidating Trust is dissolved in accordance with
Section 27.14(d) of the Plan (or otherwise in accordance with this
Agreement), the Liquidating Trust shall file with (or furnish to,
as the case may be) the SEC or otherwise make available to the
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries quarterly reports that are
substantially similar to such Post-Confirmation Quarterly Summary
Reports.


 

ARTICLE V

 

TAX
MATTERS

 


5.1 
  Liquidating Trustee’s Tax Power for
Debtors .


 


(a) 
  For all taxable periods ended on or before December
31, 2009, the Liquidating Trustee shall have full and exclusive
authority and responsibility in respect of all Taxes of the Debtors
(including, without limitation, as the common parent or other agent
of any consolidated, combined or unitary Tax group of which the
Debtors were the agent), to the same extent as if the Liquidating
Trustee were the Debtors.  Without limiting the
foregoing, each of the Debtors shall execute, on or prior to the
Effective Date, a power of attorney authorizing the Liquidating
Trustee to correspond with any Tax authority on behalf of such
Debtor and to sign, collect, negotiate, settle, and administer Tax
payments and Tax returns.


 


(b) 
  In furtherance of the transfer of the Liquidating
Trust Assets to the Liquidating Trust on the Effective Date, the
Liquidating Trust shall be entitled to all Tax Refunds of the
Debtors (and the Liquidating Trust shall bear responsibility for
(i) all Tax liabilities of the Debtors for taxable years ended on
or before December 31, 2009, to the extent not discharged by the
Plan or provided for payment in


 

 


 



16





 


 
the Plan or the
Global Settlement Agreement and (ii) WMI’s obligations
pursuant to Section 2.4 of the Global Settlement Agreement), it
being understood that the Liquidating Trustee only shall have
whatever rights the Debtors have pursuant to the terms of the
Global Settlement Agreement, and the Liquidating Trustee shall be
contractually bound to all restrictions in the Global Settlement
Agreement with respect to Tax filings.

 


(c) 
  Following the Effective Date, the Liquidating Trustee
shall prepare and file (or cause to be prepared and filed), on
behalf of the Debtors, all Tax Returns required to be filed or that
the Liquidating Trustee otherwise deems appropriate, including the
filing of amended Tax Returns or requests for refunds for all
taxable periods ended on or before December 31, 2009.


 


5.2 
  Liquidating Trust Assets Treated as Owned by
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries .  For all United
States federal income tax purposes, all parties (including, without
limitation, the Debtors, the Reorganized Debtors, the Liquidating
Trustee, and the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries) shall treat the
transfer of the Liquidating Trust Assets to the Liquidating Trust
as (1) a transfer of the Liquidating Trust Assets (subject to any
obligations relating to those assets) directly to the Liquidating
Trust Beneficiaries and, to the extent Liquidating Trust Assets are
allocable to Disputed Claims, to the Liquidating Trust Claims
Reserve, followed by (2) the transfer by such beneficiaries to the
Liquidating Trust of the Liquidating Trust Assets (other than the
Liquidating Trust Assets allocable to the Liquidating Trust Claims
Reserve) in exchange for Liquidating Trust
Interests.  Accordingly, the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries shall be treated for United States federal income tax
purposes as the grantors and owners of their respective share of
the Liquidating Trust Assets (other than such Liquidating Trust
Assets as are allocable to the Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve,
discussed below).  The foregoing treatment shall also
apply, to the extent permitted by applicable law, for state and
local income tax purposes.


 


5.3 
  Tax Reporting .


 


(a) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall file Tax Returns for
the Liquidating Trust treating the Liquidating Trust as a grantor
trust pursuant to Treasury Regulation section 1.671-4(a) and in
accordance with this Article V .  The Liquidating
Trustee also will annually send to each holder of a Liquidating
Trust Interest a separate statement regarding the receipts and
expenditures of the Liquidating Trust as relevant for United States
federal income tax purposes and will instruct all such holders to
use such information in preparing their United States federal
income tax returns or to forward the appropriate information to
such holder’s underlying beneficial holders with instructions
to utilize such information in preparing their United States
federal income tax returns.  The Liquidating Trustee
shall also file (or cause to be filed) any other statement, return
or disclosure relating to the Liquidating Trust that is required by
any governmental unit.


 


(b) 
  On or before the Effective Date, the Debtors shall
provide the Liquidating Trustee with a good-faith valuation of the
Tax Refunds as of the Effective Date or shall otherwise arrange for
such a valuation to be provided to the Liquidating


 

 


 



17





 


 
Trustee as soon as
practicable after the Effective Date by such third party
professionals as the Debtors deem appropriate.  The
Liquidating Trustee, in consultation with the Trust Advisory Board,
will then in good faith value all other Liquidating Trust Assets,
and shall make all such values (including the Tax Refund values)
publicly available from time to time (by posting on a website or
otherwise), to the extent relevant, and such values shall be used
consistently by all parties to the Liquidating Trust (including,
without limitation, the Debtors, the Liquidating Trustee, and
Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries) for all United States federal
income tax purposes.

 


(c) 
  Allocations of Liquidating Trust taxable income among
the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries (other than taxable income
allocable to the Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve) shall be
determined by reference to the manner in which an amount of Cash
representing such taxable income would be distributed (were such
cash permitted to be distributed at such time) if, immediately
prior to such deemed distribution, the Liquidating Trust had
distributed all its assets (valued at their tax book value, and
other than assets allocable to the Liquidating Trust Claims
Reserve) to the holders of the Liquidating Trust Interests,
adjusted for prior taxable income and loss and taking into account
all prior and concurrent distributions from the Liquidating
Trust.  Similarly, taxable loss of the Liquidating Trust
shall be allocated by reference to the manner in which an economic
loss would be borne immediately after a hypothetical liquidating
distribution of the remaining Liquidating Trust
Assets.  The tax book value of the Liquidating Trust
Assets for purposes of this Section 5.3(c) shall equal their
fair market value on the Effective Date, adjusted in accordance
with tax accounting principles prescribed by the IRC, the
applicable Treasury Regulations, and other applicable
administrative and judicial authorities and pronouncements.


 


(d) 
  Subject to definitive guidance from the IRS or a
court of competent jurisdiction to the contrary (including the
receipt by the Liquidating Trustee of a private letter ruling if
the Liquidating Trustee so requests one, or the receipt of an
adverse determination by the IRS upon audit if not contested by the
Liquidating Trustee), the Liquidating Trustee shall (i) timely
elect to treat any Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve as a
“disputed ownership fund” governed by Treasury
Regulation section 1.468B-9, and (ii) to the extent permitted by
applicable law, report consistently with the foregoing for state
and local income tax purposes.  All parties (including
the Liquidating Trustee, the Debtors, and the Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries) shall report for United States federal, state and
local income tax purposes consistently with the foregoing.


 


(e) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall be responsible for
payment, out of the Liquidating Trust Assets, of any Taxes imposed
on the Liquidating Trust or its assets, including the Liquidating
Trust Claims Reserve.  In the event, and to the extent,
any Cash retained on account of Disputed Claims in the Liquidating
Trust Claims Reserve is insufficient to pay the portion of any such
Taxes attributable to the taxable income arising from the assets
allocable to, or retained on account of, Disputed Claims (including
any income that may arise upon the distribution of the assets from
the Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve), such Taxes may be (i)
reimbursed from any subsequent Cash amounts retained on account of
Disputed Claims, or (ii) to the extent


 

 


 



18





 


 
such Disputed
Claims have subsequently been resolved, deducted from any amounts
otherwise distributable by the Liquidating Trustee as a result of
the resolution of such Disputed Claims.

 


(f) 
  The Liquidating Trustee may request an expedited
determination of Taxes of the Liquidating Trust, including the
Liquidating Trust Claims Reserve, or the Debtors under section
505(b) of the Bankruptcy Code for all Tax Returns filed for, or on
behalf of, the Liquidating Trust or the Debtors for all taxable
periods through the dissolution of the Liquidating Trust.


 


5.4 
  Tax Withholdings by Liquidating Trustee
.  The Liquidating Trustee may withhold and pay to the
appropriate Tax Authority all amounts required to be withheld
pursuant to the IRC or any provision of any foreign, state or local
tax law with respect to any payment or distribution to the holders
of Liquidating Trust Interests.  All such amounts
withheld and paid to the appropriate Tax Authority (or placed in
escrow pending resolution of the need to withhold) shall be treated
as amounts distributed to such holders of Liquidating Trust
Interests for all purposes of the Trust Agreement. The Liquidating
Trustee shall be authorized to collect such tax information from
the holders of Liquidating Trust Interests (including, without
limitation, social security numbers or other tax identification
numbers) as in its sole discretion the Liquidating Trustee deems
necessary to effectuate the Plan, the Confirmation Order, and the
Trust Agreement. In order to receive distributions under the Plan,
all holders of Liquidating Trust Interests (including, without
limitation, holders of Allowed Senior Notes Claims, Allowed Senior
Subordinated Notes Claims, Allowed CCB-1 Guarantees Claims, Allowed
CCB-2 Guarantees Claims, Allowed General Unsecured Claims, Allowed
Late-Filed Claims, Allowed PIERS Claims, Allowed WMB Senior Notes
Claims, Allowed Preferred Equity Interests, Allowed Common Equity
Interests, holders of Dime Warrants, and Accepting Non-Filing WMB
Senior Note Holders, who in each case, deliver a release in
accordance with the provisions of Section 41.6 of the Plan) shall
be required to identify themselves to the Liquidating Trustee and
provide tax information and the specifics of their holdings, to the
extent the Liquidating Trustee deems appropriate in the manner and
in accordance with the procedures from time to time established by
the Liquidating Trustee for these purposes.  This
identification requirement generally applies to all holders,
including those who hold their Claims in “street
name.”  The Liquidating Trustee may refuse to make
a distribution to any holder of a Liquidating Trust Interest that
fails to furnish such information in a timely fashion, and until
such information is delivered may treat such holder’s
Liquidating Trust Interests as disputed; provided ,
however , that, upon the delivery of such information by a
holder of a Liquidating Trust Interest, the Liquidating Trustee
shall make such distribution to which the holder of the Liquidating
Trust Interest is entitled, without additional interest occasioned
by such holder’s delay in providing tax information; and,
provided , further , that, if such information is not
furnished to the Liquidating Trustee within six (6) months of the
original request to furnish such information, no further
distributions shall be made to the holder of such Liquidating Trust
Interest; and, provided , further , that, if the
Liquidating Trustee fails to withhold in respect of amounts
received or distributable with respect to


 

 


 



19





 


 
any such holder and
the Liquidating Trustee is later held liable for the amount of such
withholding, such holder shall reimburse the Liquidating Trustee
for such liability (to the extent such amounts were actually
distributed to such holder).

 

ARTICLE VI

 

POWERS OF AND
LIMITATIONS ON THE TRUSTEES

 


6.1 
  Liquidating Trustee .


 


(a) 
  “ Liquidating Trustee ” means
William C. Kosturos so long as he continues in office, and all
other individuals who have been duly elected and qualify as
liquidating trustees of the Liquidating Trust hereunder pursuant to
Section 1.4 or Article VIII hereof, but shall not include
the Resident Trustee.  Subject to Article VIII
hereof, the Liquidating Trustee shall hold office until the
termination of the Liquidating Trust in accordance with the terms
set forth herein.  References herein to the Liquidating
Trustee shall refer to the individual or individuals serving as the
Liquidating Trustee solely in its or their capacity as trustees
hereunder.


 


(b) 
  Subject to the express limitations set forth herein,
any actions of the Liquidating Trustee contemplated by this Trust
Agreement shall be decided and conducted by the Liquidating Trustee
only.


 


6.2 
  Powers of the Liquidating Trustee .


 


(a) 
  Pursuant to the terms of the Plan, the Confirmation
Order and this Trust Agreement, the Liquidating Trustee shall have
various powers, duties and responsibilities concerning the
prosecution of certain litigation claims, the disposition of
assets, the resolution of claims, and numerous other obligations
relating to maximizing the proceeds of the Liquidating Trust Assets
and the administration of the Liquidating Trust.


 


(b) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall have only such rights,
powers and privileges expressly set forth in the Confirmation
Order, the Plan and this Trust Agreement and as otherwise provided
by applicable law.  Subject to the Confirmation Order,
the Plan, the Global Settlement Agreement and the provisions of
this Trust Agreement, including, without limitation, the oversight
and approvals by and of the Trust Advisory Board, the Litigation
Subcommittee and the Bankruptcy Court provided herein, the
Liquidating Trustee shall be expressly authorized to undertake the
following actions (and, except with respect to Section
6.2(b)(iii) and Section 6.2(b)(vi) , to delegate such
authority to such representatives or agents of the Liquidating
Trustee as the Liquidating Trustee may nominate from time to
time):


 


(i) 
  to open bank accounts, and to hold, manage, convert
to Cash, and distribute the Liquidating Trust Assets,


 

 


 



20





 


 

including
prosecuting and resolving the Claims and Causes of Action belonging
to the Liquidating Trust;


 


(ii) 
  to hold the Liquidating Trust Assets for the benefit
of the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries, whether their Claims or
Interests are Allowed on or after the Effective Date;


 


(iii) 
  in the Liquidating Trustee’s reasonable
business judgment, to investigate, prosecute, settle and/or abandon
rights, Causes of Action, Claims, or litigation of the Liquidating
Trust, including, without limitation, Avoidance Actions;


 


(iv) 
  to monitor and enforce the implementation of the
Plan;


 


(v) 
  to file all Tax and regulatory forms, returns,
reports, and other documents required with respect to the
Liquidating Trust;


 


(vi) 
  in the Liquidating Trustee’s reasonable
business judgment, to object to Claims, and manage, control,
prosecute, and/or settle on behalf of the Liquidating Trust,
objections to Claims on account of which the Liquidating Trustee
(as Disbursing Agent) will be responsible (if Allowed) for making
distributions under the Plan;


 


(vii) 
  to take all actions and create any document necessary
to implement the Plan;


 


(viii) 
  to hold, manage, and distribute Cash or non-Cash
Liquidating Trust Assets obtained through the exercise of its power
and authority;


 


(ix) 
  to act as a signatory to the Debtors for all
purposes, including those associated with the novation of contracts
or other obligations arising out of the sales of the Debtors’
assets; and


 


(x) 
  to take all necessary actions and file all
appropriate motions to obtain an order closing the Chapter 11
Cases.


 


(c) 
  In all circumstances, the Liquidating Trustee shall
comply with all of the Debtors’ obligations under the Global
Settlement Agreement and in accordance with applicable law and
shall otherwise act in the best interest of all Liquidating Trust
Beneficiaries, and the Liquidating Trustee shall act in furtherance
of the purpose of the Liquidating Trust.  With the
consent of the Trust Advisory Board, the Liquidating Trustee may
serve on the board of directors of any subsidiary of the


 

 


 



21





 


 
Liquidating Trust,
provided the subsidiary’s objective is consistent with that
of the Liquidating Trust (i.e. to sell its assets and distribute
the proceeds in liquidation) (the “ Objective
”).

 


(d) 
  Except as otherwise provided in this Trust Agreement,
the Liquidating Trustee will not be required to obtain the order or
approval of the Bankruptcy Court, or any other court of competent
jurisdiction in, or account to the Bankruptcy Court or any other
court of competent jurisdiction for, the exercise of any right,
power or privilege conferred hereunder.  Notwithstanding
the foregoing, where the Liquidating Trustee determines, in its
reasonable discretion, that it is necessary, appropriate or
desirable, the Liquidating Trustee will have the right to submit to
the Bankruptcy Court any question or questions regarding any
specific action proposed to be taken by the Liquidating Trustee
with respect to this Trust Agreement, the Liquidating Trust, or the
Liquidating Trust Assets, including, without limitation, the
administration and distribution of the Liquidating Trust Assets and
the termination of the Liquidating Trust.  Pursuant to
the Plan, the Bankruptcy Court has retained jurisdiction for such
purposes and may approve or disapprove any such proposed action
upon motion by the Liquidating Trustee.


 


6.3 
  Limitations on Liquidating Trustee .


 


(a) 
  The Liquidating Trustee shall, on behalf of the
Liquidating Trust, hold the Liquidating Trust out as a trust in the
process of liquidation and not as an investment
company.  The Liquidating Trustee shall be restricted to
the liquidation of the Liquidating Trust Assets on behalf, and for
the benefit, of the Liquidating Trust Beneficiaries and the
distribution and application of Liquidating Trust Assets for the
purposes set forth in, and the conservation and




 








 



















WMI Liquidating Trust






















Loading, please wait...
















Active Cases


KCC Precedent 


Client Login





Active Cases


KCC Precedent 


Client Login








Search All KCC Documents







KCC Precedent Search Options
KCC's Corporate Restructuring Court Documents Search provides access to thousands of historical court documents located on KCC public access websites. Please use the form below to refine and maximize search results.
For information about the data provided, please review the Disclaimer statement.









                            Court Docket Number List




                            Date Filed From







                            Date Filed To








Document Name





Jurisdiction

Middle District of Alabama
Northern District of Alabama
Southern District of Alabama
District of Alaska
District of Arizona
Eastern & Western District of Arkansas
Central District of California
Eastern District of California
Northern District of California
Southern District of California
District of Colorado
District of Connecticut
District of Delaware
District of District of Columbia
Middle District of Florida
Northern District of Florida
Southern District of Florida
Middle District of Georgia
Northern District of Georgia
Southern District of Georgia
District of Hawaii
District of Idaho
Central District of Illinois
Northern District of Illinois
Southern District of Illinois
Northern District of Indiana
Southern District of Indiana
Northern District of Iowa
Southern District of Iowa
District of Kansas
Eastern District of Kentucky
Western District of Kentucky
Eastern District of Louisiana
Middle District of Louisiana
Western District of Louisiana
District of Maine
District of Maryland
District of Massachusetts
Eastern District of Michigan
Western District of Michigan
District of Minnesota
Northern District of Mississippi
Southern District of Mississippi
Eastern District of Missouri
Western District of Missouri
District of Montana
District of Nebraska
District of Nevada
District of New Hampshire
District of New Jersey
District of New Mexico
Eastern District of New York
Northern District of New York
Southern District of New York
Western District of New York
Eastern District of North Carolina
Middle District of North Carolina
Western District of North Carolina
District of North Dakota
Northern District of Ohio
Southern District of Ohio
Northern District of Oklahoma
Western District of Oklahoma
District of Oregon
Eastern District of Pennsylvania
Middle District of Pennsylvania
Western District of Pennsylvania
District of Puerto Rico
District of Rhode Island
District of South Carolina
District of South Dakota
Eastern District of Tennessee
Middle District of Tennessee
Western District of Tennessee
Eastern District of Texas
Northern District of Texas
Southern District of Texas
Western District of Texas
District of Utah
District of Vermont
Eastern District of Virginia
Western District of Virginia
Eastern District of Washington
Western District of Washington
Northern District of West Virginia
Southern District of West Virginia
Eastern District of Wisconsin
Western District of Wisconsin
District of Wyoming






Judge
(Search All)
ABG
ABJ
AJC
AJG
ALG
AMK
ASH
AST
BAM
BB
BJH
BLS
BRL
BSS
btb
BWB
CAG
CEC
CED
CER
CGC
CGM
CMC
CPM
CSS
DDO
DHS
DJ
DM
DML
DOT
DRD
DRJ
DSO
EAS
EC
ERW
GCP
GLT
GM
GMB
GWZ
Hale
HB
HDH
HEB
HJB
HRT
Isgur
JAD
JAF
JBR
JDG
JHW
JKO
JLG
JMP
JNF
JPS
JRH
JSB
JSD
JTG
JVA
JWM
JWV
Kay Woods
KCF
KG
KJC
KRH
KT
LBR
LK
LSS
MBK
MBM
MCW
MEW
MFW
MG
MI
MJ
MKN
MS
MSH
NLW
PC
PCB
PGH
PJW
PMC
PSH
PWB
RAM
RBK
RBR
RDD
RDM
REG
RHJ
RJF
RK
RNK
RR
RSS
SCC
SCS
SGJ
SH
SHL
SMB
SVC
SVK
SWD
SWR
TA
TAB
TBB
TBD
TH
TJC
TJT
TMB
TMO
TMW
TOM
VZ
Walrath
WEJ
WLH
WS
WSD


(Search All)






Jointly Administered
(Search All)
Yes
No


(Search All)





Number of Filed Debtors
(Search All)
1
>1
>50
>100


(Search All)

(Search All)
>1
>50
>100






Case Name

10-16648 | 1800Hotels4U, LLC
17-22770 | 21st Century Oncology Holdings, Inc. et al.
88-42100 | 3L
14-10717 | Ablest, Inc., et al
05-40809 | Access CardioSystems, Inc.
09-11516 | Accredited Home Lenders Holding Co.
88-36100 | Accutane
08-11467 | ACG Holdings, Inc. (American Color Graphics)
88-36000 | Actos
09-20711 | Adamar of New Jersey, Inc. (Tropicana Atlantic City)
13-11153 | Adoc Holdings, Inc., et al. (f/k/a Coda Holdings, Inc.)
08-46367 | Advantage Rent A Car (ARC Venture Holding, Inc., et al.)
17-10500 | AEI Winddown, Inc. (f/k/a Aquion Energy, Inc.)
11-14138 | AES Eastern Energy, L.P., et al.
88-22500 | AES Eastern Energy, L.P., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
12-11127 | AFA Investment Inc.
09-13178 | Affiliated Foods Southwest, Inc., et al.
14-10282 | After-Party2, Inc. (f/k/a Event Rentals, Inc.), et al.
11-14220 | AGH Liquidating, LLC, et al. (f/k/a Alexander Gallo Holdings, LLC, et al.)
11-53860 | Ahern Rentals, Inc.
15-33896 | Alpha Natural Resources, Inc., et al.
10-15973 | Ambac Financial Group, Inc.
10-37144 | AMCORE Financial, Inc.
16-10670 | American Hospice Management Holdings, LLC
08-10178 | American LaFrance, LLC
10-16140 | American Media, Inc., et al.
12-36495 | AMF Bowling Worldwide, Inc., et al.
09-21323 | AmFin Financial Corporation, et al. (f/k/a AmTrust Financial Corporation, et al.)
14-73348 | Amsterdam House Continuing Care Retirement Community, Inc.
13-14003 | Anchor BanCorp Wisconsin Inc.
16-11090 | AOG Entertainment, Inc., et al.
11-10160 | Appleseed's Intermediate Holdings LLC, et al. d/b/a Orchard Brands
11-20059 | Archdiocese of Milwaukee
08-12323 | Archway Cookies LLC, et al.
09-12628 | Arclin US Holdings Inc.
12-10605 | Arctic Glacier International Inc., et al.
15-12465 | Arctic Sentinel, Inc. (f/k/a Fuhu, Inc.), et al.
16-41504 | AstroTurf, LLC
12-36187 | ATP Oil & Gas Corporation, et al.
07-11276 | Avado Brands, Inc., et al.
17-30461 | Azure Midstream Partners, LP, et al.
08-33980 | B. Moss Clothing Company Ltd.
08-14818 | Bally Total Fitness of Greater New York, Inc.
07-12395 | Bally Total Fitness of Greater New York, Inc. (2007)
11-10792 | Barnes Bay Development, Ltd., et al.
11-10792 | Barnes Bay Development, Ltd., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
07-15195 | Bayonne Medical Center
07-15195 | Bayonne Medical Center (Creditors' Committee)
10-14997 | BB Liquidating Inc., et al. (f/k/a Blockbuster Inc., et al.)
05-46580 | BBi Enterprises, L.P., et al.
09-00634 | BFW Liquidation, LLC Formerly Known as Bruno's Supermarkets, LLC
08-14604 | BH S&B Holdings LLC, et al.
08-04413 | BHM Technologies Holdings, Inc.
09-02140 | BI-LO, LLC
09-02140 | BI-LO, LLC (Creditors' Trust)
10-13301 | Black Gaming, LLC, et al.
11-13603 | Blitz U.S.A., Inc., et al.
16-30296 | Blue Earth, Inc., et al.
15-11880 | Boardriders, Inc., f/k/a Quiksilver, Inc., et al.
08-18501 | Bordier's Nursery, Inc.
10-60348 | Bosque Power Company, LLC, et al.
15-60016 | BPZ Resources, Inc.
12-13581 | Broadview Networks Holdings, Inc.
03-32715 | Brobeck, Phleger & Harrison, LLP
14-10752 | Brookstone Holdings Corp., et al.
07-19705 | Brotman Medical Center, Inc.
08-11637 | BSCV, Inc. (f/k/a Boscov's, Inc.) et al.
88-35900 | Byetta
12-11882 | C International Inc. f/k/a Cinram International Inc., et al.
15-10172 | Caché, Inc., et al.
08-11973 | Cadence Innovation, LLC, et al.
15-10458 | Cal Dive International, Inc., et al.
05-60200 | Calpine Corporation, et al.
08-36642 | Canal Corporation f/k/a Chesapeake Corporation, et al.
12-58409 | Capitol Bancorp Ltd.
12-12664 | Carey Limousine L.A., Inc.
10-12553 | Caribbean Petroleum Corp., et al.
11-11387 | Caribe Media, Inc., et al.
88-35100 | Carson Shell
07-16604 | CCI of West Palm, Inc., et al.
11-79079 | CDC Liquidation Trust
11-80202 | CGLA Liquidation, Inc. f/k/a Cagle's, Inc., et al.
08-01369 | CHA Hawaii, LLC
16-11144 | Chaparral Energy, Inc., et al.
09-11435 | Charter Communications, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
09-11435 | Charter Communications, Inc., et al.
08-10289 | Charys Holding Company, Inc., et al.
16-31854 | CHC Group Ltd.
09-00358 | Checker Motors Corporation
10-11567 | Chem RX Corporation, et al.
09-11233 | Chemtura Corporation
09-11092 | Chicago Newspaper Liquidation Corp. f/k/a Sun-Times Media Group, Inc., et al.
15-10482 | Chromcraft Revington, Inc., et al.
99-24000 | CIBC Fair Fund Settlement Fund
08-35653 | Circuit City Stores, Inc.
12-51156 | Circus and Eldorado Joint Venture, et al.
09-16565 | CIT Group Inc., et al.
09-17442 | Citadel Broadcasting Corporation, et al.
13-53846 | City of Detroit, Michigan
15-64266 | Clayton General, Inc., f/k/a Southern Regional Health System, Inc. d/b/a Southern Regional Medical Center
14-24874 | Cloudeeva, Inc., et al.
05-55927 | Collins & Aikman Corporation, et al.
15-11296 | Colt Holding Company LLC
16-33971 | Connect Transport, LLC, et al.
14-11238 | ConnectEdu, Inc., et al.
09-22035 | Consolidated Resorts, Inc., et al.
11-10109 | Constar International Inc.
09-42392 | Contech U.S., LLC, et al.
88-08700 | Contributions 2009-2010 Cycle
09-12743 | Cooper-Standard Holdings Inc., et al.
09-35127 | Corus Construction Venture LLC
06-12226 | Coudert Brothers, LLP
09-13038 | Cynergy Data, LLC
09-41966 | D-A-M Liquidating Corp., et al.
09-11351 | Dayton Superior Corporation
08-12687 | DBSI Inc., et al.
08-12687 | DBSI Inc., et al. (Creditor's Committee)
10-11310 | Deel, LLC, et al. (f/k/a Magic Brands, LLC a/k/a Fuddruckers, Inc.)
07-16302 | Delta Entertainment Corporation (Creditors' Committee)
06-11045 | Deltak Plan Administrator
12-12568 | Digital Domain Media Group, Inc. (DDMG), et al.
12-12568 | Digital Domain Media Group, Inc. (DDMG), et al. (Creditors' Committee)
08-10375 | DJK Residential LLC, et al. (SIRVA, Inc.)
05-44481 | DPH Holdings Corporation
11-11941 | DSI Holdings, Inc., et al. (Deb Shops, Inc.)
06-11202 | DURA Automotive Systems, Inc., et al.
11-38111 | Dynegy Holdings, LLC (Creditors' Committee)
14-12303 | Eagle Bulk Shipping Inc.
12-10202 | Eastman Kodak Company, et al.
09-12099 | EBHI Holdings, Inc. (f/k/a Eddie Bauer Holdings, Inc.) et al.
08-13031 | Eclipse Aviation Corporation, et al.
10-25922 | Ecoly International, Inc., et al. (a/k/a Sexy Hair Concepts, LLC)
10-25922 | Ecoly International, Inc., et al. (a/k/a Sexy Hair Concepts, LLC) (Creditors' Committee)
09-20644 | Edge Petroleum Corp., et al.
13-16126 | Electric Transportation Engineering Corporation (d/b/a ECOtality North America), et al.
14-12308 | Endeavour Operating Corporation, et al.
12-43166 | Energy Conversion Devices, Inc.
12-43166 | Energy Conversion Devices, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
10-11236 | EnviroSolutions of New York, LLC, et al.
17-10243 | EO Liquidating, LLC, et al. (f/k/a Eastern Outfitters, LLC, et al.)
08-22581 | EOS Airlines, Inc.
16-34393 | Erickson Incorporated, et al.
09-07970 | Eurofresh, Inc., et al. (a.k.a. Eurofresh Farms)
09-15008 | EUSA Liquidation Inc., (f/k/a Escada (USA) Inc.)
09-13764 | Extended Stay Inc., et al.
08-13256 | EZ Lube, LLC, et al.
10-50494 | Fair Finance Company
14-11987 | FCC Holdings, Inc. et al.
09-14386 | FFRT Development L.P., et. al. (f/k/a FFRT Residential, LLC, et al., f/k/a Fairfield Residential LLC, et al.)
16-12238 | FIAC Corp. (f/k/a IMX Acquisition Corp.)
11-13511 | Filene's Basement, LLC and Syms Corp.
11-13511 | Filene's Basement, LLC, et al. (Creditors' Committee)
16-12192 | Filip Technologies, Inc., et al.
09-33918 | FirstPlus Financial Group, Inc.
13-22094 | Flat Out Crazy, LLC, et al.
09-14254 | Fleetwood Enterprises, Inc., et al.
05-20011 | FLYi, Inc., et al. (Independence Air)
09-21481 | Fontainebleau Las Vegas Holdings, LLC et al.
17-20023 | Forbes Energy Services, Ltd., et al.
09-12964 | FormTech Industries, LLC, et al.
09-40795 | Forum Health
08-13421 | Fremont General (Creditors' Committee)
08-13421 | Fremont General Corporation
11-13167 | Friendly Ice Cream Corporation, et al. (Creditors' Committee)
04-22421 | FV Steel and Wire Company, et al. (Keystone Consolidated Industries, Inc.)
10-47879 | Gas City, Ltd., et. al.
16-22192 | GCM Liquidation Corporation (f/k/a Gulf Chemical & Metallurgical Corporation)
11-06098 | GEI-RP (f/k/a Giordano's Enterprises, Inc., et al.)
09-11977 | General Growth Properties, Inc., et al.
11-15606 | Getty Petroleum Marketing Inc.
09-14337 | GFI Wisconsin, Inc. fka Grede Foundries, Inc.
13-12945 | Global Aviation Holdings Inc., et al.
12-40783 | Global Aviation Holdings Inc., et al.
13-51562 | Global Axcess Corp., et al.
10-12819 | Goldcoast Liquidating, LLC et al. (f/k/a Claim Jumper Restaurants, LLC, et al.)
17-31575 | Goodman Networks Incorporated, et al.
09-10157 | Gottschalks Inc.
88-34800 | Granuflo
16-00290 | Great Lakes Comnet, Inc., et al.
08-53104 | Greektown Holdings, LLC, et al.
09-31703 | Greenbrier Hotel Corporation, et al.
13-58200 | Groeb Farms, Inc.
12-10685 | Grubb & Ellis Company, et al.
14-11916 | GT Advanced Technologies Inc., et al.
08-12430 | GWLS Holdings, Inc. (Greatwide)
16-10296 | Hancock Fabrics, Inc., et al.
88-20200 | Hanley-Wood, LLC
11-49744 | Hartford Computer Hardware, Inc., et al.
08-02005 | Hawaiian Telcom Communications, Inc., et al.
08-02005 | Hawaiian Telcom Communications, Inc., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
12-11873 | Hawker Beechcraft, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
15-11874 | HH Liquidation, LLC (f/k/a Haggen Holdings, LLC)
14-70323 | hibu Inc., et al.
13-11326 | Highway Technologies, Inc., et al.
08-31961 | Home Interiors & Gifts, Inc., et al.
07-11079 | HomeBanc Mortgage Corporation, et al.
12-15610 | Houghton Mifflin Harcourt Publishing Company
09-10231 | HPG International, Inc., et al.
09-11770 | Hub Holding Corp., et al., f/k/a Anchor Blue Retail Group, Inc., et al.
06-62179 | I.E. Liquidation, Inc. (f.k.a. Ideal Electric Co.)
12-13319 | ICL Holding Company, Inc. (f/k/a LCI Holding Company, Inc.), et al.
09-31828 | Idearc Inc., et al.
08-10960 | IdleAire Technologies Corporation
15-11133 | Imaging US Liquidating Corporation (f/k/a IMRIS, Inc.)
09-10019 | IMH, Inc. (f/k/a Interlake Material Handling, Inc., et al.)
15-10578 | In re Chassix Holdings, Inc., et al. (Creditors Committee)
08-11079 | Interep National Radio Sales, Inc., et al.
08-11859 | Intermet Corporation, et al.
10-10003 | International Aluminum Corporation
04-45814 | Interstate Bakeries Corporation et al.
09-13125 | ION Media Networks, Inc., et al.
13-12050 | IPC International Corporation, et al.
11-57191 | Irwin Mortgage Corporation
88-31900 | IST Shareholder Services
14-34284 | ITR Concession Company LLC
88-35800 | Januvia
10-10198 | Japan Airlines Corporation, et al.
11-10212 | Javo Beverage Company, Inc.
11-05736 | Jefferson County, Alabama
08-37225 | Jon M. Harder
08-13324 | Key Plastics Finance Corp.
17-11330 | Keystone Tube Company, LLC (A.M. Castle & Co.)
08-10095 | Kimball Hill, Inc., et al.
10-60149 | Lack's Stores, Incorporated
08-17814 | Lake at Las Vegas Joint Venture, LLC, et al.
08-11111 | LandSource Communities Development LLC, et al.
09-10023 | LB Trust
09-14326 | Lear Corporation
07-19845 | Levitt and Sons, LLC, et al.
12-12080 | LightSquared Inc., et al.
16-32689 | Linc USA GP, et al.
08-10832 | Linens Holding Co., et al. (Linens ‘n Things, Inc.)
10-13677 | Local Insight Media Holdings, Inc., et al.
13-10238 | LodgeNet Interactive Corporation, et al.
10-16077 | Loehmann's Holdings, Inc.
08-10824 | Louisiana Riverboat Gaming Partnership (Legends Gaming)
12-12013 | Louisiana Riverboat Gaming Partnership, et al.
13-02100 | Lyon Workspace Products, L.L.C.
09-10023 | Lyondell Chemical Company Creditors' Commitee
09-10023 | Lyondell Shareholder Clawback Litigation
09-10720 | Magna Entertainment Corp., et al.
11-39347 | Maguire Group Holdings, Inc.
15-12080 | Malibu Lighting Corporation
11-13634 | Marco Polo Seatrade B.V., et al.
09-10844 | Masonite Corporation, et al.
09-11191 | Mercedes Homes, Inc., et al.
09-13356 | Meruelo Maddux Properties, Inc.
08-11586 | Mervyn's Holdings, LLC
13-13591 | Metro Affiliates, Inc., et al.
10-11485 | MiddleBrook Pharmaceuticals, Inc.
16-32237 | Midstates Petroleum Company, Inc., et al.
09-11235 | Milacron Inc., et al.
10-13528 | Millennium Multiple Employer Welfare Benefit Plan
88-34900 | Mirena
09-10998 | MMC Precision Holdings Corp., et al. (aka Morton Metalcraft Co.)
16-12825 | Modular Space Holdings, Inc., et al.
15-11357 | Molycorp, Inc. Unsecured Creditors Committee
14-22503 | Momentive Performance Materials (MPM Silicones, LLC)
10-10134 | Morris Publishing Group LLC
08-12136 | Motor Coach Industries International, Inc., et al.
07-33849 | Movie Gallery, Inc., et al.
10-30696 | Movie Gallery, Inc., et al. (2010)
11-10372 | MSR Resort Golf Course LLC, et al.
08-07254 | Nashville Senior Living, LLC, et al.
11-12005 | Nebraska Book Company, Inc., et al.
10-12610 | Neff Corp., et al.
12-23557 | Neogenix Oncology, Inc.
16-11074 | NephroGenex, Inc.
07-04295 | NetBank, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
11-28676 | Nevada Cancer Institute, a Nevada nonprofit corporation
11-10753 | New Stream Secured Capital, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
11-10753 | New Stream Secured Capital, Inc., et al.
15-02741 | New WEI, Inc. f/k/a Walter Energy, Inc.
11-12804 | NewPage Corporation, et al.
88-36200 | Nexium
88-35700 | NFL Concussion Settlement
14-12611 | NII Holdings, Inc. et al. (Creditors' Committee)
09-10138 | Nortel Networks Inc., et al. (Committee of Retired Employees)
09-10138 | Nortel Networks Inc., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
09-10138 | Nortel Networks Inc., et al. (Long Term Disability Plan Participants)
08-60731 | North Oakland Medical Center (Pontiac General Hospital)
03-12872 | NorthWestern Corporation
03-13024 | NRG Energy Inc., et al.
12-12323 | Odyssey Diversified
15-01145 | Official Committee of Second Priority Noteholders of Caesars Entertainment Operating Company, Inc.
16-40120 | Official Committee of Unsecured Creditors of Arch Coal, Inc.
16-31854 | Official Committee of Unsecured Creditors of CHC Group Ltd.
14-10979 | Official Committees of Energy Future Holdings Corp., et al. 
09-10478 | Old AII, Inc. (f/k/a Aleris International Inc.), et al.
09-50002 | Old Carco LLC (f/k/a Chrysler LLC) (Creditors' Committee)
15-10836 | Old FOH, Inc. (f/k/a Frederick's of Hollywood, Inc.)
12-22052 | Old HB, Inc. (f/k/a Hostess Brands, Inc.)
10-12351 | Old Razor Company, LLC (f/k/a/ American Safety Razor Company, LLC), et al.
13-11540 | OnCure Holdings, Inc., et al.
10-10684 | Orleans Homebuilders, Inc., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
13-10334 | Ormet Corporation
10-12636 | OTC Holdings Corporation
13-10593 | Otelco Inc., et al
11-13686 | Otero County Hospital Association, Inc. (d/b/a Gerald Champion Regional Medical Center)
12-20000 | Overseas Shipholding Group, Inc., et al.
06-12579 | Ownit Mortgage Solutions, Inc.
08-13917 | Paper International, Inc., et al.
16-10386 | Paragon Offshore plc, et al.
16-42529 | Peabody Energy Corporation, et al.
09-10170 | Pecus ARG Holding, Inc., et al.
13-10061 | Penson Worldwide, Inc., et al.
88-27400 | Penson Worldwide, Inc., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
10-10689 | Penton Business Media Holdings, Inc., et al.
12-15811 | People's Choice Home Loan, Inc., et al.
13-12965 | Physiotherapy Holdings, Inc., et al.
08-11480 | Pierre Foods, Inc., et al.
08-45664 | Pilgrim's Pride Corporation, et al.
11-10688 | PJ Finance Company, LLC, et al. (Creditors' Committee)
15-11062 | Plover Appetizer Co., f/k/a Golden County Foods, Inc.
07-13532 | PLVTZ, Inc. (d/b/a Levitz Furniture)
08-10498 | Powermate Holding Corp., et al.
13-10134 | Powerwave Technologies, Inc.
13-10134 | Powerwave Technologies, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
08-13289 | PPI Holdings Inc.
88-35600 | Pradaxa
09-12019 | Premier International Holdings Inc., et al. (aka Six Flags, Inc.) (Creditors’ Committee)
11-12676 | Premier Trailer Leasing, Inc., et al.
16-10073 | Primorsk International Shipping Limited
07-26206 | Princeton Ski Shop, Inc., et al.
17-11572 | Prospector Offshore Drilling S.à r.l., et al.
05-06782 | Protocol Services, Inc. et al.
09-12659 | ProtoStar Ltd., et al.
09-33886 | Provident Royalties, LLC, et al. (Official Investors Committee)
08-10152 | Quebecor World (USA) Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
06-10894 | Radnor Holdings Corporation, et al.
09-10617 | RCC Liquidating Corp. f/k/a Ritz Camera Centers, Inc.
10-35313 | RCLC, INC. f/k/a Ronson Corporation, et al.
11-41853 | RCR Plumbing and Mechanical, Inc.
07-13239 | Real Estate Partners, Inc.
16-00438 | Receivership for Aequitas Management, LLC et al.
09-10002 | Recycled Paper Greetings, Inc., et al.
12-32349 | Reddy Ice Holdings, Inc. et al.
10-10632 | Regent Communications, Inc., et al
08-43775 | Renaissance Hospital Grand Prairie, Inc., et al.
17-11592 | Rent-A-Wreck of America, Inc., et al.
12-12020 | Residential Capital, LLC et al.
09-10087 | Retail Pro, Inc., et al.
12-33788 | Richfield Equities, L.L.C.
13-34483 | RIH Acquisitions NJ, LLC, et al.
88-34700 | Risperdal
12-11868 | Ritz Camera & Image, L.L.C., et al.
06-10110 | RNI Wind Down Corporation f/k/a Riverstone Networks, Inc. et al.
09-38215 | Roper Brothers Lumber Company, Inc., et al.
16-33433 | Rotary Drilling Tools USA, LLC, et al.
11-40603 | Ruden McClosky P.A.
17-22045 | rue21, inc., et al.
16-10292 | Ryckman Creek Resources, LLC et al.
09-30805 | S & K Famous Brands, Inc.
16-50778 | Sanjel (USA) Inc.
13-10125 | School Specialty, Inc., et al.
13-10125 | School Specialty, Inc., et al. (Ombudsman Website)
11-20089 | Seahawk Drilling, Inc.
88-08000 | Sega Entertainment U.S.A., Inc.
07-18769 | Select Snacks, Inc., et al.
08-11525 | SemCrude, L.P., et al. (SemGroup, L.P.)
16-50058 | Sepco Corporation
16-10238 | SFX Entertainment, Inc., et al.
09-10367 | Shane Co.
16-20012 | Sherwin Alumina Company, LLC, et al.
15-11498 | Signal International, Inc.
08-10637 | Skybus Airlines, Inc.
11-12254 | Small Loans, Inc., et al.
09-10235 | Smurfit Stone Container Corporation (Creditors' Committee)
12-11136 | Solar Trust of America LLC, et al.
88-23800 | Somerset Cayuga Holding Company, Inc.
14-10454 | Sorenson Communications, Inc., et al.
14-11553 | Source Home Entertainment, LLC, et al.
09-11424 | Source Interlink Companies, Inc., et al.
12-12690 | Southern Air Holdings, Inc., et al.
08-13312 | Special Devices, Incorporated
08-13312 | Special Devices, Incorporated (Creditors' Committee)
14-00279 | Specialty Hospital of Washington, LLC
10-10142 | Specialty Packaging Holdings, Inc.
09-10990 | Sportsman's Warehouse, Inc., et al.
88-34400 | SSRI Lawsuits
10-11963 | St. Vincent's Catholic Medical Centers of New York
09-07468 | StarTrans, Inc.
09-52477 | Station Casinos, Inc., et al.
09-52477 | Station Casinos, Inc., et al. (Creditors' Committee)
15-01145 | Statutory Unsecured Claimholders’ Committee of Caesars Entertainment Operating Company, Inc., et al.
08-02966 | Sturgis Iron & Metal Co., Inc.
17-10561 | Sunco Liquidation, Inc., (f/k/a Sungevity, Inc.) et al.
15-12670 | Swift Energy Company, et al.
13-11041 | Synagro Technologies, Inc. et. al
08-14692 | T H Agriculture & Nutrition, L.L.C.
09-10555 | Tarragon Corporation
14-40987 | TelexFree, LLC
16-10300 | TGHI, Inc., et al.
12-10512 | The Connaught Group, Ltd., et al.
14-10614 | The Dolan Company
10-24549 | The Great Atlantic & Pacific Tea Co.
09-14136 | The Majestic Star Casino, LLC, et al. (Creditors' Committee)
10-27694 | The Newark Group, Inc.
11-13730 | The PMI Group, Inc.
09-23529 | The Reader's Digest Association, Inc. et al.
14-20371 | The Roman Catholic Bishop of Stockton
09-15138 | The Walking Company, et al.
12-13398 | THQ Inc.
08-21644 | Tiles & Stones, Inc. (Creditors' Committee) 
11-03216 | TMG Liquidation Company, et al. (f/k/a The Merit Group, Inc., et al.)
17-10184 | Toisa Limited, et al.
88-37100 | Tonon Luxembourg S.A.
08-10928 | TOUSA, Inc., et al.
16-33437 | TPP Acquisition, Inc. d/b/a The Picture People
11-08348 | Trailer Bridge, Inc.
88-34500 | Transvaginal Mesh
08-13141 | Tribune Company (Creditors' Committee)
08-10720 | Tricom S.A.
12-10069 | Trident Microsystems, Inc., et al.
09-13181 | Triple Crown Media, Inc.
09-01198 | Tronox Inc., et al. v. Kerr-McGee Corp., et al. and United States v. Tronox, Inc., et al. (In re Tronox Inc.)
09-10156 | Tronox Incorporated (Creditors' Committee)
09-10156 | Tronox Incorporated, et al.
08-10856 | Tropicana Entertainment, LLC
66-00001 | Troubled Waters, et al.
10-13513 | Truvo USA LLC, et al.
16-10527 | TSA WD Holdings, Inc., et al. (f/k/a Sports Authority Holdings, Inc.)
08-10322 | TSIC, Inc. f/k/a Sharper Image Corporation
07-10787 | Tweeter Home Entertainment Group, Inc., et al.
88-35000 | TXI Settlement
88-35300 | Tylenol
11-10245 | Ultimate Acquisition Partners, LP
05-10104 | Ultimate Electronics, Inc. et al.
09-11854 | Ultra Stores, Inc., et al.
88-12300 | Unisen, Inc. (fdba Star Trac)
10-10209 | Uno Restaurant Holdings Corporation, et al.
15-11755 | USA Discounters, Ltd., et al.
09-11150 | USI Senior Holdings, Inc., et al.
17-30112 | Vanity Shop of Grand Forks, Inc.
09-13294 | VEC Liquidating Corporation, et al. f/k/a Velocity Express Corporation, et al.
08-12606 | VeraSun Energy Corporation
10-16170 | Vertis Holdings, Inc., et al.
12-12821 | Vertis Holdings, Inc., et al.
08-11461 | Vertis, Inc.
14-10311 | Victor Oolitic Stone Company
88-35500 | Victoza
09-11786 | Visteon Corporation (Creditors' Committee)
09-11786 | Visteon Corporation, et al.
11-32602 | Vitro America, LLC
16-10971 | VRG Liquidating, LLC (f/k/a Vestis Retail Group, LLC)
16-11290 | VSI Liquidating Inc. (f/k/a Vertellus Specialties Inc.), et al.
08-12229 | Washington Mutual, Inc.
12-13896 | Wave2Wave Communications, Inc.
15-12097 | WCH Liquidation Holdings, Inc. f/k/a Wire Company Holdings, Inc.
08-10595 | Wellman Inc., et al.
08-10595 | Wellman, Inc. (Creditors' Committee)
17-10751 | Westinghouse Electric Company LLC, et al.
17-10751 | Westinghouse Electric Company, LLC (Statutory Unsecured Claimholders’ Committee)
11-14019 | William Lyon Homes, et al.
15-52722 | Wings of Medina Liquidation, Inc. et al. (f/k/a QSL of Medina, Inc.)
15-52722 | Wings of Medina Liquidation, Inc. et al. (f/k/a QSL of Medina, Inc.) Unsecured Creditors Committee
08-12229 | WMI Liquidating Trust
08-20682 | Woodside Group, LLC, et al.
10-74617 | Workflow Management, Inc., et al.
08-12412 | WorldSpace, Inc. et al.
12-11661 | WP Steel Venture LLC, et al.
88-34600 | Xarelto (Rivaroxaban)
09-02046 | XMH CORP. 1 (f/k/a Hartmarx Corporation), et al.
88-35400 | Yaz
12-37961 | ZF in Liquidation, LLC, fka Zacky Farms, LLC
88-35200 | Zofran






Case Filed Date From






Case Filed Date To















Disclaimer +-



Kurtzman Carson Consultants LLC ("KCC") does not guarantee or warrant that the data provided herein is accurate, complete, or current and shall not be liable to you for any loss or injury arising out of or caused in whole or in part by the acts, errors or omissions of KCC, whether negligent or otherwise, in procuring, compiling, gathering, formatting, interpreting, reporting, communicating or delivering the information contained in this website. KCC does not undertake any obligation to update, modify, revise or reorganize the information provided herein, or to notify you or any third party should the information be updated, modified, revised or reorganized. In no event shall KCC be liable to you or any third party for any direct, indirect, incidental, consequential or special damages (including, but not limited to, damages arising from the disallowance of a potential claim against a client of KCC or damages to business reputation, lost business or lost profits), whether foreseeable or unforeseeable and however caused, even if KCC is advised of the possibility of such damages. KCC is not in the business of providing professional or legal advice with respect to this website service and this website service should not be relied on as a substitute for financial, legal or other professional advice.
Please review KCC's Terms of Use and Privacy Statement for additional information regarding the data maintained on this website. By using this site, you consent to the terms of KCC's Terms of Use and Privacy Statement regarding the use and processing of personal information, and any and all other terms that may be set forth on this site concerning the collection of personal information. If you do not agree to these terms, you should not use this site. You further agree that by utilizing this site, your rights and obligations, as well as the rights and obligations of KCC, shall be governed, at KCC's sole discretion, by the laws of the State of California.
Electronic mail or other communications through this website or otherwise to KCC or any party in connection with any matter will not be treated as privileged or confidential. KCC does not endorse or warrant and is not responsible for any third-party content that may be accessed from this website.





















WMI Liquidating Trust
Case Number:
08-12229







SPECIAL ANNOUNCEMENT DATED 7/28/2017:
NO DISTRIBUTIONS WILL BE MADE TO HOLDERS OF LTIs ON AUGUST 1, 2017. UPDATED LIQUIDATING TRUST INTEREST STATEMENTS FOR MEMBERS OF EACH OF CLASSES 2 (“SENIOR FLOATING RATE NOTES”), 12 (“GENERAL UNSECURED CLAIMS”), AND 16 (“PIERS CLAIMS”) WILL BE MAILED BEGINNING AUGUST 7, 2017.
    

PRESS RELEASE DATED 3/16/2017 - WMI Liquidating Trust Issues Statement on Escrow CUSIPs
Please click here to  review the Press Release.
    

General Information
On September 26, 2008, Washington Mutual, Inc. ("WMI") and WMI Investment Corp. ("WMIC" and together with WMI, the "Debtors") filed voluntary petitions for relief under chapter 11 of the United States Bankruptcy Code in the United States Bankruptcy Court for the District of Delaware (the "Court") (Case No. 08-12229 (MFW)).

On February 24, 2012 (the "Confirmation Date"), the Court entered an order confirming the Debtors' Modified Seventh Amended Joint Plan of Affiliated Debtors Pursuant to Chapter 11 of the United Stated Bankruptcy Code, dated December 12, 2011 as modified (the "Plan"). To view a copy of the Plan, together with the corresponding press release and Form 8-K that was filed by WMI with the Securities and Exchange Commission ("SEC") on the Confirmation Date, please click  here to access the Plan.

On March 19, 2012 (the "Effective Date"), the Plan became effective and certain of the Debtors' assets were transferred to a newly formed Delaware liquidating trust (the "WMI Liquidating Trust") as further described in the Plan. To view a copy of the Form 8-K that was filed by WMI (which changed its name to WMI Holdings Corp. on the Effective Date) with the SEC on the Effective Date, please click here.

Further information regarding the WMI Liquidating Trust and/or the Debtors is available by clicking on each of the links to the left. The link titled "Bankruptcy Court Documents" contains a link to the filings that the Debtors have made with the Court.  The link titled "Beneficiary Tax Information" includes important tax information for beneficial holders regarding the WMI Liquidating Trust interests.


Registered Shareholders
For inquiries related to the exchange of WaMu shares, please call 1-866-436-2534.
For inquiries about the newly issued Washington Mutual shares, please call 1-866-436-2125




Confirmation of Chapter 11 Plan
To view the press release and related information regarding the confirmation of Washington Mutual, Inc. chapter 11 plan of reorganization, please click here to access the documents.


Important Documents
Seventh Amended Joint Plan of Reorganization dated 12/12/2011 [DN 9178]
Disclosure Statement, as Revised dated 1/9/2012 [DN 9365]
Confirmation Order dated 2/24/2012 [DN 9759]
WMI Liquidating Trust Agreement - Executed Version dated 3/12/2012 [DN 9933]
Effective Date Notice dated 3/19/2012 [DN 9933]
Distributions and Value Consideration Summary dated 3/19/2012
    




Contact Us

Please contact the Washington Mutual Restructuring Hotline with any claims related questions at (888) 830-4644, or click here to submit an inquiry.




About this Site
This site contains information about the WMI Liquidating Trust and the Debtors. This site, and each of the sites referenced above, will be updated from time to time by KCC. Holders of beneficial interests in the WMI Liquidating Trust are encouraged to review the information that is contained on this site thoroughly and on a regular basis.
    


















Trust Agreement, Trust Contracts - Free Legal Documents (page 1 Of 78)

















 


















                 You are here: Agreements   > Trust Agreement    

 
Search Documents | Browse Documents













SITE SEARCH


AGREEMENTS / CONTRACTS






Document Title:



Entire Document:(optional)



Governing Law(optional)

AllAlabamaAlaskaArizonaArkansasCaliforniaColoradoConnecticutDelawareFlorida
                            GeorgiaHawaiiIdahoIllinoisIndianaIowaKansasKentuckyLouisianaMaineMaryland
                            MassachusettsMichiganMinnesotaMississippiMissouriMontanaNebraskaNevada
                            New HampshireNew JerseyNew MexicoNew YorkNorth CarolinaNorth DakotaOhioOklahoma
                            OregonPennsylvaniaRhode IslandSouth CarolinaSouth DakotaTennesseeTexasUtah
                            VermontVirginiaWashingtonWest VirginiaWisconsinWyoming 






Try our advanced search >>

CLAUSES
Search Contract Clauses >>
Browse Contract Clause Library>>








Trust Agreements 





	These Trust Agreements are actual legal documents drafted by top law firms for their clients. Use them for competitive intelligence, drafting documents or to get information about transactions within a particular industry or sector. We have millions of legal documents and clauses that you can search for free.	



1) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/31/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
2) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TRUST 2017-A | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON | FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TWO LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/30/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
3) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO LEASE TWO LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
4) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
5) TRUST SALE AGREEMENT BETWEEN ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC DEPOSITOR AND ALLY AUTO RECEIVABLES TRUST 2017-2 ISSUING ENTITY DATED AS OF MARCH 29, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | Closing Date, Ally Bank | DEUTSCHE BANK NATIONAL TRUST COMPANY | DEUTSCHE BANK TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/23/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
6) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/22/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
7) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
8) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A | Citibank, NA | CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
9) CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A PURCHASE AGREEMENTParties: CNH EQUIPMENT TRUST 2017-A | CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | CNH INDUSTRIAL CAPITAL AMERICA LLC 
								Law Firm: Greenberg Traurig
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
10) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: CNH CAPITAL RECEIVABLES LLC | Citibank, NA | WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 3/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
11) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | ADMINISTRATOR, TOYOTA MOTOR CREDIT CORPORATION, TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | Corporate Trust Services 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
12) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: WORLD OMNI AUTO LEASING LLC | DEPOSITOR, ANY AFFILIATE | MUFG Union Bank, NA | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 3/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
13) FIRST AMENDMENT TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED DECLARATION OF TRUST AND TRUST AGREEMENT OF EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS A Delaware Statutory TrustParties: EQUINOX FRONTIER BALANCED FUND | Equinox Frontier Funds | Equinox Fund Management, LLC | Frontier Fund Management LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

14) FIRST AMENDMENT TO SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED DECLARATION OF TRUST AND TRUST AGREEMENT OF EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS A Delaware Statutory TrustParties: EQUINOX FRONTIER FUNDS | Equinox Fund Management, LLC | Frontier Fund Management LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/10/2017

15) FORM OF AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | ADMINISTRATOR, TOYOTA MOTOR CREDIT CORPORATION, TOYOTA AUTO FINANCE RECEIVABLES LLC | Corporate Trust Services 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
16) TRUST AGREEMENTParties: WORLD OMNI LT | DEPOSITOR, ANY AFFILIATE | MUFG Union Bank, NA | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | WORLD OMNI AUTO LEASING LLC 
								
								Document Date: 3/9/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
17) MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP. and CONTINENTAL STOCK TRANSFER  TRUST COMPANY FORM OF WARRANT AGREEMENT Dated as of , 2017Parties: MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP. | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | MODERN MEDIA ACQUISITION CORP | Modern Media Sponsor, LLC 
								Law Firm: Jones Day
								Document Date: 3/8/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
18) JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 TRUST AGREEMENT between JOHN DEERE RECEIVABLES, INC. Depositor and WELLS FARGO DELAWARE TRUST COMPANY, N.A. Owner Trustee Dated as of March 1, 2017Parties: JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 | Deere  Company | John Deere Receivables, Inc | US Bank National Association 
								
								Document Date: 3/2/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
19) AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT amongParties: CREDIT ACCEPTANCE CORP | CREDIT ACCEPTANCE FUNDING LLC | Trust and US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								Law Firm: Skadden Arps
								Document Date: 3/1/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
20) LCI INDUSTRIES GRANTOR TRUST AGREEMENTParties: LCI INDUSTRIES | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

21) AMENDMENT TO THE TRUST AGREEMENT Establishing theParties: ZIONS BANCORPORATION /UT/ | Prudential Bank | Prudential Financial, Inc, CIGNA Bank  Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Connecticut
22) SEVENTH AMENDMENT TO TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN FIDELITY MANAGEMENT TRUST COMPANY AND ZIONS BANCORPORATIONParties: ZIONS BANCORPORATION /UT/ | Fidelity Management Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

23) SIXTH AMENDMENT TO TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN FIDELITY MANAGEMENT TRUST COMPANY AND FMC CORPORATIONParties: FMC CORP | Fidelity Management Trust Company | FMC Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/28/2017

24) AMENDED AND RESTATED 80% COINSURANCE TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of March 31, 2016 amongParties: PRIMERICA, INC. | Bank of New York Mellon | PECAN RE INC | Primerica Life Insurance Company 
								Law Firm: DLA Piper;Debevoise Plimpton
								Document Date: 2/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Massachusetts
25) SILVER BAY REALTY TRUST CORP. ANNOUNCES AGREEMENT TO BE ACQUIRED BY TRICON CAPITAL GROUP INC. IN $1.4 BILLION ALL-CASH TRANSACTION; REPORTS STRONG FOURTH QUARTER AND FULL YEAR 2016 FINANCIAL RESULTSParties: SILVER BAY REALTY TRUST CORP. | Silver Bay Realty Trust Corp | Tricon Capital Group Inc 
								Law Firm: Orrick Herrington
								Document Date: 2/27/2017

26) JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 TRUST AGREEMENT between JOHN DEERE RECEIVABLES, INC. Depositor and WELLS FARGO DELAWARE TRUST COMPANY, N.A. Owner Trustee Dated as of March 1, 2017Parties: JOHN DEERE OWNER TRUST 2017 | Deere  Company | John Deere Receivables, Inc | US Bank National Association 
								
								Document Date: 2/24/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
27) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: MATLIN  PARTNERS ACQUISITION CORP | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | Investment Management | Matlin  Partners Acquisition Corporation 
								
								Document Date: 2/15/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
28) TRUST AGREEMENT AMONG ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT DATED AS OF JANUARY 31, 2017Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 2/2/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
29) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO OWNER TRUST 2017-A | FORD CREDIT AUTO RECEIVABLES TWO LLC | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/27/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
30) TRUST AGREEMENT [BETWEEN][AMONG] ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC, DEPOSITOR [AND] BNY MELLON TRUST OF DELAWARE, OWNER TRUSTEE [AND THE BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS PAYING AGENT]1Parties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON TRUST COMPANY, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
31) TRUST SALE AGREEMENTParties: ALLY AUTO ASSETS LLC | Closing Date, Ally Bank | DEUTSCHE BANK NATIONAL TRUST COMPANY | DEUTSCHE BANK TRUST COMPANY 
								
								Document Date: 1/26/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
32) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP. II | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | FinTech Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 1/25/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
33) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FORD CREDIT AUTO OWNER TRUST 2017-A | FORD CREDIT AUTO RECEIVABLES TWO LLC | US BANK TRUST NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
34) VORNADO REALTY TRUST 2017 OUTPERFORMANCE PLAN AWARD AGREEMENTParties: VORNADO REALTY LP | VORNADO REALTY TRUST 
								
								Document Date: 1/20/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
35) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1A Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1A American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017-1AParties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
36) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1AA Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1AA American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017Parties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
37) TRUST SUPPLEMENT NO. 2017-1B Dated as of January 13, 2017 between AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC., and WILMINGTON TRUST COMPANY, as Trustee, to PASS THROUGH TRUST AGREEMENT Dated as of September 16, 2014 American Airlines Pass Through Trust 2017-1B American Airlines Pass Through Certificates, Series 2017-1BParties: AMERICAN AIRLINES INC | AMERICAN AIRLINES, INC | CEDE  CO | Wilmington Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 1/17/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
38) LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENTParties: ICON LEASING FUND ELEVEN, LLC | ICON CAPITAL, LLC | NRAI SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/5/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
39) LIQUIDATING TRUST AGREEMENTParties: ICON LEASING FUND TWELVE, LLC | ICON CAPITAL, LLC | NRAI SERVICES, LLC 
								
								Document Date: 1/5/2017
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
40) AMENDMENT TO INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: INSPIRED ENTERTAINMENT, INC. | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | Hydra Industries Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
41) COLLATERAL TRUST AGREEMENT dated as of October 3, 2016 among TEX OPERATIONS COMPANY LLC, as the Company, the Grantors from time to time party heretoParties: VISTRA ENERGY CORP | 4CHANGE ENERGY COMPANY LLC | BIG BROWN POWER COMPANY LLC | BRIGHTEN ENERGY LLC | COMANCHE PEAK POWER COMPANY LLC | DALLAS POWER  LIGHT COMPANY, INC | DEUTSCHE BANK AG | EFH CORPORATE SERVICES COMPANY | EFH PROPERTIES COMPANY | ENERGY INDUSTRIES COMPANY, INC | FORNEY PIPELINE, LLC | GENERATION SVC COMPANY | LA FRONTERA HOLDINGS, LLC | LONE ST AR PIPELINE COMPANY, INC | LONE STAR ENERGY COMPANY, INC | LUMINANT ENERGY COMPANY LLC | LUMINANT ENERGY TRADING CALIFORNIA COMPANY | LUMINANT ET SERVICES COMPANY LLC | LUMINANT GENERATION COMPANY LLC | Luminant Mining Company, LLC | NCA RESOURCES DEVELOPMENT COMPANY LLC | OAK GROVE MANAGEMENT COMPANY LLC | RAILROAD COMMISSION | SANDOW POWER COMPANY LLC | SOUTHWESTERN ELECTRIC SERVICE COMPANY, INC | TEX ASSET COMPANY LLC | TEX FINANCE CORP | TEX INTERMEDIATE COMPANY LLC | TEX OPERATIONS COMPANY LLC | TEX PREFERRED INC | TXU ELECTRIC COMPANY, INC | TXU ENERGY RETAIL COMPANY LLC | TXU RETAIL SERVICES COMPANY | UTILITIES COMPANY, INC | UTILITIES ELECTRIC COMPANY, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
42) INVESTMENT MANAGEMENT TRUST AGREEMENTParties: FINTECH ACQUISITION CORP. II | Cantor Fitzgerald  Co | Continental Stock Transfer  Trust Company | FinTech Acquisition Corp | Investment Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/23/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
43) Second Amended and Restated Depositary Trust AgreementParties: ISHARES SILVER TRUST | BANK OF NEW YORK MELLON | CEDE  CO | Product Management 
								
								Document Date: 12/22/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
44) ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC., AS ISSUER ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, UK BRANCH, AS PAYING AGENT ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, AS TRANSFER AGENT ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES DAC, AS REGISTRAR - AND - WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, AS TRUSTEE AGENCY AGREEMENTParties: ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC. | CEDE  CO | ELAVON FINANCIAL SERVICES | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION | ZIMMER BIOMET HOLDINGS, INC | ZIMMER HOLDINGS, INC 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
45) Amendment No. 1 to Second Amended and Restated Trust AgreementParties: MEDALLION FINANCIAL CORP | DZ BANK AG | Medallion Funding Corp | MEDALLION FUNDING LLC | US BANK TRUST, NA 
								
								Document Date: 12/13/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
46) GRANTOR TRUST AGREEMENT BETWEEN PENTEGRA TRUST COMPANY AND FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK OF NEW YORKParties: FEDERAL HOME LOAN BANK OF NEW YORK | Federal Home Loan Bank of New York, New York | PENTEGRA TRUST COMPANY | RSGroup Trust Company 
								
								Document Date: 12/9/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Maine
47) SECOND AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT OF COMPASS DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS AMONG COMPASS GROUP DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS LLC as SponsorParties: COMPASS DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS | ANY OTHER REGULATORY AUTHORITY | ANY STATE SECURITIES COMMISSION | COMPASS GROUP DIVERSIFIED HOLDINGS LLC 
								Law Firm: Richards Layton;Patton Boggs
								Document Date: 12/7/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
48) HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT between HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC, as the Depositor and CITIBANK, N.A., as the Owner Trustee and CITICORP TRUST DELAWARE, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as the Issuer Delaware Trustee Dated as of November 30, 2016Parties: HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 | CEDE  CO | CITIBANK, NA | HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC | Huntington National Bank | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 12/1/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
49) FOURTH AMENDMENT TO INDEMNIFICATION TRUST AGREEMENTParties: J C PENNEY CO INC | Chemical Bank | J C Penney Company, Inc, J C Penney Corporation, Inc | JPMorgan Chase Bank | SunTrust Bank 
								
								Document Date: 11/30/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:New York
50) HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 AMENDED AND RESTATED TRUST AGREEMENT between HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC, as the Depositor and CITIBANK, N.A., as the Owner Trustee and CITICORP TRUST DELAWARE, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as the Issuer Delaware Trustee Dated as of November 30, 2016Parties: HUNTINGTON AUTO TRUST 2016-1 | CEDE  CO | CITIBANK, NA | HUNTINGTON FUNDING, LLC | Huntington National Bank | WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION 
								
								Document Date: 11/29/2016
								
								
								Governing Law:Delaware
 




Browse by StateGo directly to a specific page of results:123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233343536373839404142434445464748495051525354555657585960616263646566676869707172737475767778 
 
 

 












